Privacy contact details
Project(fan-made): A-Calc Community Apps
This policy was last modified on 07/03/2024
Angaben gemäß § 5 TMG
Udo Schulz
c/o Schlunke
Potsdamer Str. 93a
14513 Teltow
Germany
Email: privacy@a-calc.de | info@a-calc.de
Website: https://www.a-calc.de
PRIVACY POLICY FOR MOBILE APPLICATIONS
A-Calc built the A-Calc Community apps as
                    an Ad Supported app. This SERVICE is provided by
                    A-Calc at no cost and is intended for
                    use as is.
This page is used to inform visitors regarding
                    my policies with the collection, use, and
                    disclosure of Personal Information if anyone decided to use
                    my Service.
If you choose to use my Service, then you agree
                    to the collection and use of information in relation to this
                    policy. The Personal Information that I collect is
                    used for providing and improving the Service.
                    I will not use or share your
                    information with anyone except as described in this Privacy
                    Policy.
The terms used in this Privacy Policy have the same meanings
                    as in our Terms and Conditions, which is accessible at
                    A-Calc unless otherwise defined in this Privacy
                    Policy.
Information Collection and Use
For a better experience, while using our Service,
                    I may require you to provide us with certain
                    personally identifiable information, including but not limited to device ID. The
                    information that I request will be
                    retained on your device and is not collected by me in any way.
The app does use third party services that may collect
                    information used to identify you.
Link to privacy policy of third party service providers
                      used by the app
Google Play Services
AdMob
Firebase Analytics
Facebook
Microsoft Visual Studio App Center Services
Log Data
I want to inform you that whenever
                    you use my Service, in a case of an error in the
                    app I collect data and information (through third
                    party products) on your phone called Log Data. This Log Data
                    may include information such as your device Internet
                    Protocol (“IP”) address, device name, operating system
                    version, the configuration of the app when utilizing
                    my Service, the time and date of your use of the
                    Service, and other statistics.
Cookies
Cookies are files with a small amount of data that are
                    commonly used as anonymous unique identifiers. These are
                    sent to your browser from the websites that you visit and
                    are stored on your device's internal memory.
This Service does not use these “cookies” explicitly.
                    However, the app may use third party code and libraries that
                    use “cookies” to collect information and improve their
                    services. You have the option to either accept or refuse
                    these cookies and know when a cookie is being sent to your
                    device. If you choose to refuse our cookies, you may not be
                    able to use some portions of this Service.
Service Providers
I may employ third-party companies
                    and individuals due to the following reasons:
To facilitate our Service;
To provide the Service on our behalf;
To perform Service-related services; or
To assist us in analyzing how our Service is used.
I want to inform users of this
                    Service that these third parties have access to your
                    Personal Information. The reason is to perform the tasks
                    assigned to them on our behalf. However, they are obligated
                    not to disclose or use the information for any other
                    purpose.
Security
I value your trust in providing us
                    your Personal Information, thus we are striving to use
                    commercially acceptable means of protecting it. But remember
                    that no method of transmission over the internet, or method
                    of electronic storage is 100% secure and reliable, and
                    I cannot guarantee its absolute security.
Links to Other Sites
This Service may contain links to other sites. If you click
                    on a third-party link, you will be directed to that site.
                    Note that these external sites are not operated by
                    me. Therefore, I strongly advise you to
                    review the Privacy Policy of these websites.
                    I have no control over and assume no
                    responsibility for the content, privacy policies, or
                    practices of any third-party sites or services.
Children’s Privacy
These Services do not address anyone under the age of 13.
                    I do not knowingly collect personally
                    identifiable information from children under 13. In the case
                    I discover that a child under 13 has provided
                    me with personal information,
                    I immediately delete this from our servers. If you
                    are a parent or guardian and you are aware that your child
                    has provided us with personal information, please contact
                    me so that I will be able to do
                    necessary actions.
Changes to This Privacy Policy
I may update our Privacy Policy from
                    time to time. Thus, you are advised to review this page
                    periodically for any changes. I will
                    notify you of any changes by posting the new Privacy Policy
                    on this page. These changes are effective immediately after
                    they are posted on this page.
Contact Us
If you have any questions or suggestions about
                    my Privacy Policy, do not hesitate to contact
                    me at privacy@a-calc.de.
This privacy policy page was created at
privacypolicytemplate.net
and modified/generated by
App Privacy Policy Generator
Terms & Conditions
By downloading or using the app, these terms will
                    automatically apply to you – you should make sure therefore
                    that you read them carefully before using the app. You’re
                    not allowed to copy, or modify the app, any part of the app,
                    or our trademarks in any way. You’re not allowed to attempt
                    to extract the source code of the app, and you also
                    shouldn’t try to translate the app into other languages, or
                    make derivative versions. The app itself, and all the trade
                    marks, copyright, database rights and other intellectual
                    property rights related to it, still belong to
                    A-Calc.
A-Calc is committed to ensuring that the app
                    is as useful and efficient as possible. For that reason, we
                    reserve the right to make changes to the app or to charge
                    for its services, at any time and for any reason. We will
                    never charge you for the app or its services without making
                    it very clear to you exactly what you’re paying for.
The A-Calc app stores and processes personal data
                    that you have provided to us, in order to provide
                    my Service. It’s your responsibility to keep your
                    phone and access to the app secure. We therefore recommend
                    that you do not jailbreak or root your phone, which is the
                    process of removing software restrictions and limitations
                    imposed by the official operating system of your device. It
                    could make your phone vulnerable to
                    malware/viruses/malicious programs, compromise your phone’s
                    security features and it could mean that the
                    A-Calc app won’t work properly or at all.
You should be aware that there are certain things that
                    A-Calc will not take responsibility for.
                    Certain functions of the app will require the app to have an
                    active internet connection. The connection can be Wi-Fi, or
                    provided by your mobile network provider, but
                    A-Calc cannot take responsibility for the
                    app not working at full functionality if you don’t have
                    access to Wi-Fi, and you don’t have any of your data
                    allowance left.
If you’re using the app outside of an area with Wi-Fi, you
                    should remember that your terms of the agreement with your
                    mobile network provider will still apply. As a result, you
                    may be charged by your mobile provider for the cost of data
                    for the duration of the connection while accessing the app,
                    or other third party charges. In using the app, you’re
                    accepting responsibility for any such charges, including
                    roaming data charges if you use the app outside of your home
                    territory (i.e. region or country) without turning off data
                    roaming. If you are not the bill payer for the device on
                    which you’re using the app, please be aware that we assume
                    that you have received permission from the bill payer for
                    using the app.
Along the same lines, A-Calc cannot always
                    take responsibility for the way you use the app i.e. You
                    need to make sure that your device stays charged – if it
                    runs out of battery and you can’t turn it on to avail the
                    Service, A-Calc cannot accept
                    responsibility.
With respect to A-Calc’s responsibility for
                    your use of the app, when you’re using the app, it’s
                    important to bear in mind that although we endeavour to
                    ensure that it is updated and correct at all times, we do
                    rely on third parties to provide information to us so that
                    we can make it available to you.
                    A-Calc accepts no liability for any loss,
                    direct or indirect, you experience as a result of relying
                    wholly on this functionality of the app.
At some point, we may wish to update the app. The app is
                    currently available on Android & iOS – the requirements for
                    both systems (and for any additional systems we
                    decide to extend the availability of the app to) may change,
                    and you’ll need to download the updates if you want to keep
                    using the app. A-Calc does not promise that
                    it will always update the app so that it is relevant to you
                    and/or works with the Android & iOS version that you have
                    installed on your device. However, you promise to always
                    accept updates to the application when offered to you, We
                    may also wish to stop providing the app, and may terminate
                    use of it at any time without giving notice of termination
                    to you. Unless we tell you otherwise, upon any termination,
                    (a) the rights and licenses granted to you in these terms
                    will end; (b) you must stop using the app, and (if needed)
                    delete it from your device.
Changes to This Terms and Conditions
I may update our Terms and Conditions
                    from time to time. Thus, you are advised to review this page
                    periodically for any changes. I will
                    notify you of any changes by posting the new Terms and
                    Conditions on this page. These changes are effective
                    immediately after they are posted on this page.
Contact Us
If you have any questions or suggestions about
                    my Terms and Conditions, do not hesitate to
                    contact me at privacy@a-calc.de.
This Terms and Conditions page was generated by
App Privacy Policy Generator
Privacy Policy
We are very delighted that you have shown interest in our enterprise. Data protection is of a particularly high priority for the management of the A-Calc. The use of the Internet pages of the A-Calc is possible without any indication of personal data; however, if a data subject wants to use special enterprise services via our website, processing of personal data could become necessary. If the processing of personal data is necessary and there is no statutory basis for such processing, we generally obtain consent from the data subject.
The processing of personal data, such as the name, address, e-mail address, or telephone number of a data subject shall always be in line with the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), and in accordance with the country-specific data protection regulations applicable to the A-Calc. By means of this data protection declaration, our enterprise would like to inform the general public of the nature, scope, and purpose of the personal data we collect, use and process. Furthermore, data subjects are informed, by means of this data protection declaration, of the rights to which they are entitled.
As the controller, the A-Calc has implemented numerous technical and organizational measures to ensure the most complete protection of personal data processed through this website. However, Internet-based data transmissions may in principle have security gaps, so absolute protection may not be guaranteed. For this reason, every data subject is free to transfer personal data to us via alternative means, e.g. by telephone.
1. Definitions
The data protection declaration of the A-Calc is based on the terms used by the European legislator for the adoption of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR). Our data protection declaration should be legible and understandable for the general public, as well as our customers and business partners. To ensure this, we would like to first explain the terminology used.
In this data protection declaration, we use, inter alia, the following terms:
a)    Personal data
Personal data means any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person (“data subject”). An identifiable natural person is one who can be identified, directly or indirectly, in particular by reference to an identifier such as a name, an identification number, location data, an online identifier or to one or more factors specific to the physical, physiological, genetic, mental, economic, cultural or social identity of that natural person.
b) Data subject
Data subject is any identified or identifiable natural person, whose personal data is processed by the controller responsible for the processing.
c)    Processing
Processing is any operation or set of operations which is performed on personal data or on sets of personal data, whether or not by automated means, such as collection, recording, organisation, structuring, storage, adaptation or alteration, retrieval, consultation, use, disclosure by transmission, dissemination or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, restriction, erasure or destruction.
d)    Restriction of processing
Restriction of processing is the marking of stored personal data with the aim of limiting their processing in the future.
e)    Profiling
Profiling means any form of automated processing of personal data consisting of the use of personal data to evaluate certain personal aspects relating to a natural person, in particular to analyse or predict aspects concerning that natural person's performance at work, economic situation, health, personal preferences, interests, reliability, behaviour, location or movements.
f)     Pseudonymisation
Pseudonymisation is the processing of personal data in such a manner that the personal data can no longer be attributed to a specific data subject without the use of additional information, provided that such additional information is kept separately and is subject to technical and organisational measures to ensure that the personal data are not attributed to an identified or identifiable natural person.
g)    Controller or controller responsible for the processing
Controller or controller responsible for the processing is the natural or legal person, public authority, agency or other body which, alone or jointly with others, determines the purposes and means of the processing of personal data; where the purposes and means of such processing are determined by Union or Member State law, the controller or the specific criteria for its nomination may be provided for by Union or Member State law.
h)    Processor
Processor is a natural or legal person, public authority, agency or other body which processes personal data on behalf of the controller.
i)      Recipient
Recipient is a natural or legal person, public authority, agency or another body, to which the personal data are disclosed, whether a third party or not. However, public authorities which may receive personal data in the framework of a particular inquiry in accordance with Union or Member State law shall not be regarded as recipients; the processing of those data by those public authorities shall be in compliance with the applicable data protection rules according to the purposes of the processing.
j)      Third party
Third party is a natural or legal person, public authority, agency or body other than the data subject, controller, processor and persons who, under the direct authority of the controller or processor, are authorised to process personal data.
k)    Consent
Consent of the data subject is any freely given, specific, informed and unambiguous indication of the data subject's wishes by which he or she, by a statement or by a clear affirmative action, signifies agreement to the processing of personal data relating to him or her.
2. Name and Address of the controller
Controller for the purposes of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), other data protection laws applicable in Member states of the European Union and other provisions related to data protection is:
Project(fan-made): A-Calc Community Apps
Udo Schulz
c/o Schlunke
Potsdamer Str. 93a
14513 Teltow
Germany
Email: privacy@a-calc.de
Website: https://www.a-calc.de
3. Cookies
The Internet pages of the A-Calc use cookies. Cookies are text files that are stored in a computer system via an Internet browser.
Many Internet sites and servers use cookies. Many cookies contain a so-called cookie ID. A cookie ID is a unique identifier of the cookie. It consists of a character string through which Internet pages and servers can be assigned to the specific Internet browser in which the cookie was stored. This allows visited Internet sites and servers to differentiate the individual browser of the dats subject from other Internet browsers that contain other cookies. A specific Internet browser can be recognized and identified using the unique cookie ID.
Through the use of cookies, the A-Calc can provide the users of this website with more user-friendly services that would not be possible without the cookie setting.
By means of a cookie, the information and offers on our website can be optimized with the user in mind. Cookies allow us, as previously mentioned, to recognize our website users. The purpose of this recognition is to make it easier for users to utilize our website. The website user that uses cookies, e.g. does not have to enter access data each time the website is accessed, because this is taken over by the website, and the cookie is thus stored on the user's computer system. Another example is the cookie of a shopping cart in an online shop. The online store remembers the articles that a customer has placed in the virtual shopping cart via a cookie.
The data subject may, at any time, prevent the setting of cookies through our website by means of a corresponding setting of the Internet browser used, and may thus permanently deny the setting of cookies. Furthermore, already set cookies may be deleted at any time via an Internet browser or other software programs. This is possible in all popular Internet browsers. If the data subject deactivates the setting of cookies in the Internet browser used, not all functions of our website may be entirely usable.
4. Collection of general data and information
The website of the A-Calc collects a series of general data and information when a data subject or automated system calls up the website. This general data and information are stored in the server log files. Collected may be (1) the browser types and versions used, (2) the operating system used by the accessing system, (3) the website from which an accessing system reaches our website (so-called referrers), (4) the sub-websites, (5) the date and time of access to the Internet site, (6) an Internet protocol address (IP address), (7) the Internet service provider of the accessing system, and (8) any other similar data and information that may be used in the event of attacks on our information technology systems.
When using these general data and information, the A-Calc does not draw any conclusions about the data subject. Rather, this information is needed to (1) deliver the content of our website correctly, (2) optimize the content of our website as well as its advertisement, (3) ensure the long-term viability of our information technology systems and website technology, and (4) provide law enforcement authorities with the information necessary for criminal prosecution in case of a cyber-attack. Therefore, the A-Calc analyzes anonymously collected data and information statistically, with the aim of increasing the data protection and data security of our enterprise, and to ensure an optimal level of protection for the personal data we process. The anonymous data of the server log files are stored separately from all personal data provided by a data subject.
5. Contact possibility via the website
The website of the A-Calc contains information that enables a quick electronic contact to our enterprise, as well as direct communication with us, which also includes a general address of the so-called electronic mail (e-mail address). If a data subject contacts the controller by e-mail or via a contact form, the personal data transmitted by the data subject are automatically stored. Such personal data transmitted on a voluntary basis by a data subject to the data controller are stored for the purpose of processing or contacting the data subject. There is no transfer of this personal data to third parties.
6. Routine erasure and blocking of personal data
The data controller shall process and store the personal data of the data subject only for the period necessary to achieve the purpose of storage, or as far as this is granted by the European legislator or other legislators in laws or regulations to which the controller is subject to.
If the storage purpose is not applicable, or if a storage period prescribed by the European legislator or another competent legislator expires, the personal data are routinely blocked or erased in accordance with legal requirements.
7. Rights of the data subject
a) Right of confirmation
Each data subject shall have the right granted by the European legislator to obtain from the controller the confirmation as to whether or not personal data concerning him or her are being processed. If a data subject wishes to avail himself of this right of confirmation, he or she may, at any time, contact any employee of the controller.
b) Right of access
Each data subject shall have the right granted by the European legislator to obtain from the controller free information about his or her personal data stored at any time and a copy of this information. Furthermore, the European directives and regulations grant the data subject access to the following information:
the purposes of the processing;
the categories of personal data concerned;
the recipients or categories of recipients to whom the personal data have been or will be disclosed, in particular recipients in third countries or international organisations;
where possible, the envisaged period for which the personal data will be stored, or, if not possible, the criteria used to determine that period;
the existence of the right to request from the controller rectification or erasure of personal data, or restriction of processing of personal data concerning the data subject, or to object to such processing;
the existence of the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority;
where the personal data are not collected from the data subject, any available information as to their source;
the existence of automated decision-making, including profiling, referred to in Article 22(1) and (4) of the GDPR and, at least in those cases, meaningful information about the logic involved, as well as the significance and envisaged consequences of such processing for the data subject.
Furthermore, the data subject shall have a right to obtain information as to whether personal data are transferred to a third country or to an international organisation. Where this is the case, the data subject shall have the right to be informed of the appropriate safeguards relating to the transfer.
If a data subject wishes to avail himself of this right of access, he or she may, at any time, contact any employee of the controller.
c) Right to rectification
Each data subject shall have the right granted by the European legislator to obtain from the controller without undue delay the rectification of inaccurate personal data concerning him or her. Taking into account the purposes of the processing, the data subject shall have the right to have incomplete personal data completed, including by means of providing a supplementary statement.
If a data subject wishes to exercise this right to rectification, he or she may, at any time, contact any employee of the controller.
d) Right to erasure (Right to be forgotten)
Each data subject shall have the right granted by the European legislator to obtain from the controller the erasure of personal data concerning him or her without undue delay, and the controller shall have the obligation to erase personal data without undue delay where one of the following grounds applies, as long as the processing is not necessary:
The personal data are no longer necessary in relation to the purposes for which they were collected or otherwise processed.
The data subject withdraws consent to which the processing is based according to point (a) of Article 6(1) of the GDPR, or point (a) of Article 9(2) of the GDPR, and where there is no other legal ground for the processing.
The data subject objects to the processing pursuant to Article 21(1) of the GDPR and there are no overriding legitimate grounds for the processing, or the data subject objects to the processing pursuant to Article 21(2) of the GDPR.
The personal data have been unlawfully processed.
The personal data must be erased for compliance with a legal obligation in Union or Member State law to which the controller is subject.
The personal data have been collected in relation to the offer of information society services referred to in Article 8(1) of the GDPR.
If one of the aforementioned reasons applies, and a data subject wishes to request the erasure of personal data stored by the A-Calc, he or she may, at any time, contact any employee of the controller. An employee of A-Calc shall promptly ensure that the erasure request is complied with immediately.
Where the controller has made personal data public and is obliged pursuant to Article 17(1) to erase the personal data, the controller, taking account of available technology and the cost of implementation, shall take reasonable steps, including technical measures, to inform other controllers processing the personal data that the data subject has requested erasure by such controllers of any links to, or copy or replication of, those personal data, as far as processing is not required. An employees of the A-Calc will arrange the necessary measures in individual cases.
e) Right of restriction of processing
Each data subject shall have the right granted by the European legislator to obtain from the controller restriction of processing where one of the following applies:
The accuracy of the personal data is contested by the data subject, for a period enabling the controller to verify the accuracy of the personal data.
The processing is unlawful and the data subject opposes the erasure of the personal data and requests instead the restriction of their use instead.
The controller no longer needs the personal data for the purposes of the processing, but they are required by the data subject for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims.
The data subject has objected to processing pursuant to Article 21(1) of the GDPR pending the verification whether the legitimate grounds of the controller override those of the data subject.
If one of the aforementioned conditions is met, and a data subject wishes to request the restriction of the processing of personal data stored by the A-Calc, he or she may at any time contact any employee of the controller. The employee of the A-Calc will arrange the restriction of the processing.
f) Right to data portability
Each data subject shall have the right granted by the European legislator, to receive the personal data concerning him or her, which was provided to a controller, in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format. He or she shall have the right to transmit those data to another controller without hindrance from the controller to which the personal data have been provided, as long as the processing is based on consent pursuant to point (a) of Article 6(1) of the GDPR or point (a) of Article 9(2) of the GDPR, or on a contract pursuant to point (b) of Article 6(1) of the GDPR, and the processing is carried out by automated means, as long as the processing is not necessary for the performance of a task carried out in the public interest or in the exercise of official authority vested in the controller.
Furthermore, in exercising his or her right to data portability pursuant to Article 20(1) of the GDPR, the data subject shall have the right to have personal data transmitted directly from one controller to another, where technically feasible and when doing so does not adversely affect the rights and freedoms of others.
In order to assert the right to data portability, the data subject may at any time contact any employee of the A-Calc.
g) Right to object
Each data subject shall have the right granted by the European legislator to object, on grounds relating to his or her particular situation, at any time, to processing of personal data concerning him or her, which is based on point (e) or (f) of Article 6(1) of the GDPR. This also applies to profiling based on these provisions.
The A-Calc shall no longer process the personal data in the event of the objection, unless we can demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds for the processing which override the interests, rights and freedoms of the data subject, or for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims.
If the A-Calc processes personal data for direct marketing purposes, the data subject shall have the right to object at any time to processing of personal data concerning him or her for such marketing. This applies to profiling to the extent that it is related to such direct marketing. If the data subject objects to the A-Calc to the processing for direct marketing purposes, the A-Calc will no longer process the personal data for these purposes.
In addition, the data subject has the right, on grounds relating to his or her particular situation, to object to processing of personal data concerning him or her by the A-Calc for scientific or historical research purposes, or for statistical purposes pursuant to Article 89(1) of the GDPR, unless the processing is necessary for the performance of a task carried out for reasons of public interest.
In order to exercise the right to object, the data subject may contact any employee of the A-Calc. In addition, the data subject is free in the context of the use of information society services, and notwithstanding Directive 2002/58/EC, to use his or her right to object by automated means using technical specifications.
h) Automated individual decision-making, including profiling
Each data subject shall have the right granted by the European legislator not to be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, which produces legal effects concerning him or her, or similarly significantly affects him or her, as long as the decision (1) is not is necessary for entering into, or the performance of, a contract between the data subject and a data controller, or (2) is not authorised by Union or Member State law to which the controller is subject and which also lays down suitable measures to safeguard the data subject's rights and freedoms and legitimate interests, or (3) is not based on the data subject's explicit consent.
If the decision (1) is necessary for entering into, or the performance of, a contract between the data subject and a data controller, or (2) it is based on the data subject's explicit consent, the A-Calc shall implement suitable measures to safeguard the data subject's rights and freedoms and legitimate interests, at least the right to obtain human intervention on the part of the controller, to express his or her point of view and contest the decision.
If the data subject wishes to exercise the rights concerning automated individual decision-making, he or she may, at any time, contact any employee of the A-Calc.
i) Right to withdraw data protection consent
Each data subject shall have the right granted by the European legislator to withdraw his or her consent to processing of his or her personal data at any time.
If the data subject wishes to exercise the right to withdraw the consent, he or she may, at any time, contact any employee of the A-Calc.
8. Data protection provisions about the application and use of Facebook
On this website, the controller has integrated components of the enterprise Facebook. Facebook is a social network.
A social network is a place for social meetings on the Internet, an online community, which usually allows users to communicate with each other and interact in a virtual space. A social network may serve as a platform for the exchange of opinions and experiences, or enable the Internet community to provide personal or business-related information. Facebook allows social network users to include the creation of private profiles, upload photos, and network through friend requests.
The operating company of Facebook is Facebook, Inc., 1 Hacker Way, Menlo Park, CA 94025, United States. If a person lives outside of the United States or Canada, the controller is the Facebook Ireland Ltd., 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland.
With each call-up to one of the individual pages of this Internet website, which is operated by the controller and into which a Facebook component (Facebook plug-ins) was integrated, the web browser on the information technology system of the data subject is automatically prompted to download display of the corresponding Facebook component from Facebook through the Facebook component. An overview of all the Facebook Plug-ins may be accessed under https://developers.facebook.com/docs/plugins/. During the course of this technical procedure, Facebook is made aware of what specific sub-site of our website was visited by the data subject.
If the data subject is logged in at the same time on Facebook, Facebook detects with every call-up to our website by the data subject—and for the entire duration of their stay on our Internet site—which specific sub-site of our Internet page was visited by the data subject. This information is collected through the Facebook component and associated with the respective Facebook account of the data subject. If the data subject clicks on one of the Facebook buttons integrated into our website, e.g. the "Like" button, or if the data subject submits a comment, then Facebook matches this information with the personal Facebook user account of the data subject and stores the personal data.
Facebook always receives, through the Facebook component, information about a visit to our website by the data subject, whenever the data subject is logged in at the same time on Facebook during the time of the call-up to our website. This occurs regardless of whether the data subject clicks on the Facebook component or not. If such a transmission of information to Facebook is not desirable for the data subject, then he or she may prevent this by logging off from their Facebook account before a call-up to our website is made.
The data protection guideline published by Facebook, which is available at https://facebook.com/about/privacy/, provides information about the collection, processing and use of personal data by Facebook. In addition, it is explained there what setting options Facebook offers to protect the privacy of the data subject. In addition, different configuration options are made available to allow the elimination of data transmission to Facebook. These applications may be used by the data subject to eliminate a data transmission to Facebook.
9. Data protection provisions about the application and use of functions of the Amazon Partner program
On this website, the controller has integrated Amazon components as a participant in the Amazon partner program. The Amazon components were created by Amazon with the aim to mediate customers through advertisements on various websites of the Amazon group, in particular Amazon.co.uk, Local.Amazon.co.uk, Amazon.de, BuyVIP.com, Amazon.fr, Amazon.it and Amazon.es in return for the payment of a commission. By using the Amazon components, the controller may generate advertising revenue.
The operating company of this Amazon component is Amazon EU S.à.r.l, 5 Rue Plaetis, L-2338 Luxembourg, Luxembourg.
Amazon sets a cookie the information technology system of the data subject. The definition of cookies is explained above. With each single call-up to one of the individual pages of this Internet website, which is operated by the controller and in which an Amazon component was integrated, the Internet browser on the information technology system of the data subject will automatically submit data for the purpose of online advertising and the settlement of commissions to Amazon through the respective Amazon component. During the course of this technical procedure, Amazon receives personal information that is used to trace the origin of orders from Amazon, and as a result, to allow the accounting of a commission. Among other things, Amazon may understand that the data subject has clicked on an affiliate link on our website.
The data subject may, as stated above, prevent the setting of cookies through our website at any time by means of a corresponding adjustment of the web browser used, and thus permanently deny the setting of cookies. Such an adjustment to the Internet browser used would also prevent Amazon from setting a cookie on the information technology system of the data subject. In addition, cookies already in use by Amazon may be deleted at anytime via a web browser or other software programs.
Further information and the actual data protection provisions of Amazon may be retrieved under https://www.amazon.de/gp/help/customer/display.html?nodeId=3312401&language=en_GB.
10. Data protection provisions about the application and use of Google AdSense
On this website, the controller has integrated Google AdSense. Google AdSense is an online service which allows the placement of advertising on third-party sites. Google AdSense is based on an algorithm that selects advertisements displayed on third-party sites to match with the content of the respective third-party site. Google AdSense allows an interest-based targeting of the Internet user, which is implemented by means of generating individual user profiles.
The operating company of Google's AdSense component is Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
The purpose of Google's AdSense component is the integration of advertisements on our website. Google AdSense places a cookie on the information technology system of the data subject. The definition of cookies is explained above. With the setting of the cookie, Alphabet Inc. is enabled to analyze the use of our website. With each call-up to one of the individual pages of this Internet site, which is operated by the controller and into which a Google AdSense component is integrated, the Internet browser on the information technology system of the data subject will automatically submit data through the Google AdSense component for the purpose of online advertising and the settlement of commissions to Alphabet Inc. During the course of this technical procedure, the enterprise Alphabet Inc. gains knowledge of personal data, such as the IP address of the data subject, which serves Alphabet Inc., inter alia, to understand the origin of visitors and clicks and subsequently create commission settlements.
The data subject may, as stated above, prevent the setting of cookies through our website at any time by means of a corresponding adjustment of the web browser used and thus permanently deny the setting of cookies. Such an adjustment to the Internet browser used would also prevent Alphabet Inc. from setting a cookie on the information technology system of the data subject. Additionally, cookies already in use by Alphabet Inc. may be deleted at any time via a web browser or other software programs.
Furthermore, Google AdSense also uses so-called tracking pixels. A tracking pixel is a miniature graphic that is embedded in web pages to enable a log file recording and a log file analysis through which a statistical analysis may be performed. Based on the embedded tracking pixels, Alphabet Inc. is able to determine if and when a website was opened by a data subject, and which links were clicked on by the data subject. Tracking pixels serve, inter alia, to analyze the flow of visitors on a website.
Through Google AdSense, personal data and information—which also includes the IP address, and is necessary for the collection and accounting of the displayed advertisements—is transmitted to Alphabet Inc. in the United States of America. These personal data will be stored and processed in the United States of America. The Alphabet Inc. may disclose the collected personal data through this technical procedure to third parties.
Google AdSense is further explained under the following link https://www.google.com/intl/en/adsense/start/.
11. Data protection provisions about the application and use of Google Analytics (with anonymization function)
On this website, the controller has integrated the component of Google Analytics (with the anonymizer function). Google Analytics is a web analytics service. Web analytics is the collection, gathering, and analysis of data about the behavior of visitors to websites. A web analysis service collects, inter alia, data about the website from which a person has come (the so-called referrer), which sub-pages were visited, or how often and for what duration a sub-page was viewed. Web analytics are mainly used for the optimization of a website and in order to carry out a cost-benefit analysis of Internet advertising.
The operator of the Google Analytics component is Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
For the web analytics through Google Analytics the controller uses the application "_gat. _anonymizeIp". By means of this application the IP address of the Internet connection of the data subject is abridged by Google and anonymised when accessing our websites from a Member State of the European Union or another Contracting State to the Agreement on the European Economic Area.
The purpose of the Google Analytics component is to analyze the traffic on our website. Google uses the collected data and information, inter alia, to evaluate the use of our website and to provide online reports, which show the activities on our websites, and to provide other services concerning the use of our Internet site for us.
Google Analytics places a cookie on the information technology system of the data subject. The definition of cookies is explained above. With the setting of the cookie, Google is enabled to analyze the use of our website. With each call-up to one of the individual pages of this Internet site, which is operated by the controller and into which a Google Analytics component was integrated, the Internet browser on the information technology system of the data subject will automatically submit data through the Google Analytics component for the purpose of online advertising and the settlement of commissions to Google. During the course of this technical procedure, the enterprise Google gains knowledge of personal information, such as the IP address of the data subject, which serves Google, inter alia, to understand the origin of visitors and clicks, and subsequently create commission settlements.
The cookie is used to store personal information, such as the access time, the location from which the access was made, and the frequency of visits of our website by the data subject. With each visit to our Internet site, such personal data, including the IP address of the Internet access used by the data subject, will be transmitted to Google in the United States of America. These personal data are stored by Google in the United States of America. Google may pass these personal data collected through the technical procedure to third parties.
The data subject may, as stated above, prevent the setting of cookies through our website at any time by means of a corresponding adjustment of the web browser used and thus permanently deny the setting of cookies. Such an adjustment to the Internet browser used would also prevent Google Analytics from setting a cookie on the information technology system of the data subject. In addition, cookies already in use by Google Analytics may be deleted at any time via a web browser or other software programs.
In addition, the data subject has the possibility of objecting to a collection of data that are generated by Google Analytics, which is related to the use of this website, as well as the processing of this data by Google and the chance to preclude any such. For this purpose, the data subject must download a browser add-on under the link https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout and install it. This browser add-on tells Google Analytics through a JavaScript, that any data and information about the visits of Internet pages may not be transmitted to Google Analytics. The installation of the browser add-ons is considered an objection by Google. If the information technology system of the data subject is later deleted, formatted, or newly installed, then the data subject must reinstall the browser add-ons to disable Google Analytics. If the browser add-on was uninstalled by the data subject or any other person who is attributable to their sphere of competence, or is disabled, it is possible to execute the reinstallation or reactivation of the browser add-ons.
Further information and the applicable data protection provisions of Google may be retrieved under https://www.google.com/intl/en/policies/privacy/ and under http://www.google.com/analytics/terms/us.html. Google Analytics is further explained under the following Link https://www.google.com/analytics/.
12. Data protection provisions about the application and use of Google Remarketing
On this website, the controller has integrated Google Remarketing services. Google Remarketing is a feature of Google AdWords, which allows an enterprise to display advertising to Internet users who have previously resided on the enterprise's Internet site. The integration of Google Remarketing therefore allows an enterprise to create user-based advertising and thus shows relevant advertisements to interested Internet users.
The operating company of the Google Remarketing services is the Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
The purpose of Google Remarketing is the insertion of interest-relevant advertising. Google Remarketing allows us to display ads on the Google network or on other websites, which are based on individual needs and matched to the interests of Internet users.
Google Remarketing sets a cookie on the information technology system of the data subject. The definition of cookies is explained above. With the setting of the cookie, Google enables a recognition of the visitor of our website if he calls up consecutive web pages, which are also a member of the Google advertising network. With each call-up to an Internet site on which the service has been integrated by Google Remarketing, the web browser of the data subject identifies automatically with Google. During the course of this technical procedure, Google receives personal information, such as the IP address or the surfing behaviour of the user, which Google uses, inter alia, for the insertion of interest relevant advertising.
The cookie is used to store personal information, e.g. the Internet pages visited by the data subject. Each time we visit our Internet pages, personal data, including the IP address of the Internet access used by the data subject, is transmitted to Google in the United States of America. These personal data are stored by Google in the United States of America. Google may pass these personal data collected through the technical procedure to third parties.
The data subject may, as stated above, prevent the setting of cookies through our website at any time by means of a corresponding adjustment of the web browser used and thus permanently deny the setting of cookies. Such an adjustment to the Internet browser used would also prevent Google from setting a cookie on the information technology system of the data subject. In addition, cookies already in use by Google may be deleted at any time via a web browser or other software programs.
In addition, the data subject has the possibility of objecting to the interest-based advertising by Google. For this purpose, the data subject must call up the link to www.google.de/settings/ads and make the desired settings on each Internet browser used by the data subject.
Further information and the actual data protection provisions of Google may be retrieved under https://www.google.com/intl/en/policies/privacy/.
13. Data protection provisions about the application and use of Google+
On this website, the controller has integrated the Google+ button as a component. Google+ is a so-called social network. A social network is a social meeting place on the Internet, an online community, which usually allows users to communicate with each other and interact in a virtual space. A social network may serve as a platform for the exchange of opinions and experiences, or enable the Internet community to provide personal or business-related information. Google+ allows users of the social network to include the creation of private profiles, upload photos and network through friend requests.
The operating company of Google+ is Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
With each call-up to one of the individual pages of this website, which is operated by the controller and on which a Google+ button has been integrated, the Internet browser on the information technology system of the data subject automatically downloads a display of the corresponding Google+ button of Google through the respective Google+ button component. During the course of this technical procedure, Google is made aware of what specific sub-page of our website was visited by the data subject. More detailed information about Google+ is available under https://developers.google.com/+/.
If the data subject is logged in at the same time to Google+, Google recognizes with each call-up to our website by the data subject and for the entire duration of his or her stay on our Internet site, which specific sub-pages of our Internet page were visited by the data subject. This information is collected through the Google+ button and Google matches this with the respective Google+ account associated with the data subject.
If the data subject clicks on the Google+ button integrated on our website and thus gives a Google+ 1 recommendation, then Google assigns this information to the personal Google+ user account of the data subject and stores the personal data. Google stores the Google+ 1 recommendation of the data subject, making it publicly available in accordance with the terms and conditions accepted by the data subject in this regard. Subsequently, a Google+ 1 recommendation given by the data subject on this website together with other personal data, such as the Google+ account name used by the data subject and the stored photo, is stored and processed on other Google services, such as search-engine results of the Google search engine, the Google account of the data subject or in other places, e.g. on Internet pages, or in relation to advertisements. Google is also able to link the visit to this website with other personal data stored on Google. Google further records this personal information with the purpose of improving or optimizing the various Google services.
Through the Google+ button, Google receives information that the data subject visited our website, if the data subject at the time of the call-up to our website is logged in to Google+. This occurs regardless of whether the data subject clicks or doesn’t click on the Google+ button.
If the data subject does not wish to transmit personal data to Google, he or she may prevent such transmission by logging out of his Google+ account before calling up our website.
Further information and the data protection provisions of Google may be retrieved under https://www.google.com/intl/en/policies/privacy/. More references from Google about the Google+ 1 button may be obtained under https://developers.google.com/+/web/buttons-policy.
14. Data protection provisions about the application and use of Google-AdWords
On this website, the controller has integrated Google AdWords. Google AdWords is a service for Internet advertising that allows the advertiser to place ads in Google search engine results and the Google advertising network. Google AdWords allows an advertiser to pre-define specific keywords with the help of which an ad on Google's search results only then displayed, when the user utilizes the search engine to retrieve a keyword-relevant search result. In the Google Advertising Network, the ads are distributed on relevant web pages using an automatic algorithm, taking into account the previously defined keywords.
The operating company of Google AdWords is Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
The purpose of Google AdWords is the promotion of our website by the inclusion of relevant advertising on the websites of third parties and in the search engine results of the search engine Google and an insertion of third-party advertising on our website.
If a data subject reaches our website via a Google ad, a conversion cookie is filed on the information technology system of the data subject through Google. The definition of cookies is explained above. A conversion cookie loses its validity after 30 days and is not used to identify the data subject. If the cookie has not expired, the conversion cookie is used to check whether certain sub-pages, e.g, the shopping cart from an online shop system, were called up on our website. Through the conversion cookie, both Google and the controller can understand whether a person who reached an AdWords ad on our website generated sales, that is, executed or canceled a sale of goods.
The data and information collected through the use of the conversion cookie is used by Google to create visit statistics for our website. These visit statistics are used in order to determine the total number of users who have been served through AdWords ads to ascertain the success or failure of each AdWords ad and to optimize our AdWords ads in the future. Neither our company nor other Google AdWords advertisers receive information from Google that could identify the data subject.
The conversion cookie stores personal information, e.g. the Internet pages visited by the data subject. Each time we visit our Internet pages, personal data, including the IP address of the Internet access used by the data subject, is transmitted to Google in the United States of America. These personal data are stored by Google in the United States of America. Google may pass these personal data collected through the technical procedure to third parties.
The data subject may, at any time, prevent the setting of cookies by our website, as stated above, by means of a corresponding setting of the Internet browser used and thus permanently deny the setting of cookies. Such a setting of the Internet browser used would also prevent Google from placing a conversion cookie on the information technology system of the data subject. In addition, a cookie set by Google AdWords may be deleted at any time via the Internet browser or other software programs.
The data subject has a possibility of objecting to the interest based advertisement of Google. Therefore, the data subject must access from each of the browsers in use the link www.google.de/settings/ads and set the desired settings.
Further information and the applicable data protection provisions of Google may be retrieved under https://www.google.com/intl/en/policies/privacy/.
15. Data protection provisions about the application and use of Twitter
On this website, the controller has integrated components of Twitter. Twitter is a multilingual, publicly-accessible microblogging service on which users may publish and spread so-called ‘tweets,’ e.g. short messages, which are limited to 280 characters. These short messages are available for everyone, including those who are not logged on to Twitter. The tweets are also displayed to so-called followers of the respective user. Followers are other Twitter users who follow a user's tweets. Furthermore, Twitter allows you to address a wide audience via hashtags, links or retweets.
The operating company of Twitter is Twitter International Company, One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street Dublin 2, D02 AX07, Ireland.
With each call-up to one of the individual pages of this Internet site, which is operated by the controller and on which a Twitter component (Twitter button) was integrated, the Internet browser on the information technology system of the data subject is automatically prompted to download a display of the corresponding Twitter component of Twitter. Further information about the Twitter buttons is available under https://about.twitter.com/de/resources/buttons. During the course of this technical procedure, Twitter gains knowledge of what specific sub-page of our website was visited by the data subject. The purpose of the integration of the Twitter component is a retransmission of the contents of this website to allow our users to introduce this web page to the digital world and increase our visitor numbers.
If the data subject is logged in at the same time on Twitter, Twitter detects with every call-up to our website by the data subject and for the entire duration of their stay on our Internet site which specific sub-page of our Internet page was visited by the data subject. This information is collected through the Twitter component and associated with the respective Twitter account of the data subject. If the data subject clicks on one of the Twitter buttons integrated on our website, then Twitter assigns this information to the personal Twitter user account of the data subject and stores the personal data.
Twitter receives information via the Twitter component that the data subject has visited our website, provided that the data subject is logged in on Twitter at the time of the call-up to our website. This occurs regardless of whether the person clicks on the Twitter component or not. If such a transmission of information to Twitter is not desirable for the data subject, then he or she may prevent this by logging off from their Twitter account before a call-up to our website is made.
The applicable data protection provisions of Twitter may be accessed under https://twitter.com/privacy?lang=en.
16. Data protection provisions about the application and use of DoubleClick
On this website, the controller has integrated components of DoubleClick by Google. DoubleClick is a trademark of Google, under which predominantly special online marketing solutions are marketed to advertising agencies and publishers.
The operating company of DoubleClick by Google is Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
DoubleClick by Google transmits data to the DoubleClick server with each impression, clicks, or other activity. Each of these data transfers triggers a cookie request to the data subject's browser. If the browser accepts this request, DoubleClick uses a cookie on the information technology system of the data subject. The definition of cookies is explained above. The purpose of the cookie is the optimization and display of advertising. The cookie is used, inter alia, to display and place user-relevant advertising as well as to create or improve reports on advertising campaigns. Furthermore, the cookie serves to avoid multiple display of the same advertisement.
DoubleClick uses a cookie ID that is required to execute the technical process. For example, the cookie ID is required to display an advertisement in a browser. DoubleClick may also use the Cookie ID to record which advertisements have already been displayed in a browser in order to avoid duplications. It is also possible for DoubleClick to track conversions through the cookie ID. For instance, conversions are captured, when a user has previously been shown a DoubleClick advertising ad, and he or she subsequently makes a purchase on the advertiser's website using the same Internet browser.
A cookie from DoubleClick does not contain any personal data. However, a DoubleClick cookie may contain additional campaign IDs. A campaign ID is used to identify campaigns that the user has already been in contact with.
With each call-up to one of the individual pages of this website, which is operated by the controller and on which a DoubleClick component was integrated, the Internet browser on the information technology system of the data subject is automatically prompted by the respective DoubleClick component to send data for the purpose of online advertising and billing of commissions to Google. During the course of this technical procedure, Google gains knowledge of any data that Google may use to create commission calculations. Google may, inter alia, understand that the data subject has clicked on certain links on our website.
The data subject may, as stated above, prevent the setting of cookies through our website at any time by means of a corresponding adjustment of the web browser used and thus permanently deny the setting of cookies. Such an adjustment to the Internet browser used would also prevent Google from setting a cookie on the information technology system of the data subject. In addition, cookies already in use by Google may be deleted at any time via a web browser or other software programs.
Further information and the applicable data protection provisions of DoubleClick may be retrieved under DoubleClick by Google https://www.google.com/intl/en/policies/.
17. Legal basis for the processing
Art. 6(1) lit. a GDPR serves as the legal basis for processing operations for which we obtain consent for a specific processing purpose. If the processing of personal data is necessary for the performance of a contract to which the data subject is party, as is the case, for example, when processing operations are necessary for the supply of goods or to provide any other service, the processing is based on Article 6(1) lit. b GDPR. The same applies to such processing operations which are necessary for carrying out pre-contractual measures, for example in the case of inquiries concerning our products or services. Is our company subject to a legal obligation by which processing of personal data is required, such as for the fulfillment of tax obligations, the processing is based on Art. 6(1) lit. c GDPR.
In rare cases, the processing of personal data may be necessary to protect the vital interests of the data subject or of another natural person. This would be the case, for example, if a visitor were injured in our company and his name, age, health insurance data or other vital information would have to be passed on to a doctor, hospital or other third party. Then the processing would be based on Art. 6(1) lit. d GDPR.
Finally, processing operations could be based on Article 6(1) lit. f GDPR. This legal basis is used for processing operations which are not covered by any of the abovementioned legal grounds, if processing is necessary for the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by our company or by a third party, except where such interests are overridden by the interests or fundamental rights and freedoms of the data subject which require protection of personal data. Such processing operations are particularly permissible because they have been specifically mentioned by the European legislator. He considered that a legitimate interest could be assumed if the data subject is a client of the controller (Recital 47 Sentence 2 GDPR).
18. The legitimate interests pursued by the controller or by a third party
Where the processing of personal data is based on Article 6(1) lit. f GDPR our legitimate interest is to carry out our business in favor of the well-being of all our employees and the shareholders.
19. Period for which the personal data will be stored
The criteria used to determine the period of storage of personal data is the respective statutory retention period. After expiration of that period, the corresponding data is routinely deleted, as long as it is no longer necessary for the fulfillment of the contract or the initiation of a contract.
20. Provision of personal data as statutory or contractual requirement; Requirement necessary to enter into a contract; Obligation of the data subject to provide the personal data; possible consequences of failure to provide such data
We clarify that the provision of personal data is partly required by law (e.g. tax regulations) or can also result from contractual provisions (e.g. information on the contractual partner).

Sometimes it may be necessary to conclude a contract that the data subject provides us with personal data, which must subsequently be processed by us. The data subject is, for example, obliged to provide us with personal data when our company signs a contract with him or her. The non-provision of the personal data would have the consequence that the contract with the data subject could not be concluded.

Before personal data is provided by the data subject, the data subject must contact any employee. The employee clarifies to the data subject whether the provision of the personal data is required by law or contract or is necessary for the conclusion of the contract, whether there is an obligation to provide the personal data and the consequences of non-provision of the personal data.
21. Existence of automated decision-making
As a responsible company, we do not use automatic decision-making or profiling.
This Privacy Policy has been generated by the Privacy Policy Generator of the
External Data Protection Officers
that was developed in cooperation with the
Media Law Lawyers
from WBS-LAW.
Datenschutzerklärung
Wir freuen uns sehr über Ihr Interesse an unserem Unternehmen. Datenschutz hat einen besonders hohen Stellenwert für die Geschäftsleitung der A-Calc. Eine Nutzung der Internetseiten der A-Calc ist grundsätzlich ohne jede Angabe personenbezogener Daten möglich. Sofern eine betroffene Person besondere Services unseres Unternehmens über unsere Internetseite in Anspruch nehmen möchte, könnte jedoch eine Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten erforderlich werden. Ist die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten erforderlich und besteht für eine solche Verarbeitung keine gesetzliche Grundlage, holen wir generell eine Einwilligung der betroffenen Person ein.
Die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten, beispielsweise des Namens, der Anschrift, E-Mail-Adresse oder Telefonnummer einer betroffenen Person, erfolgt stets im Einklang mit der Datenschutz-Grundverordnung und in Übereinstimmung mit den für die A-Calc geltenden landesspezifischen Datenschutzbestimmungen. Mittels dieser Datenschutzerklärung möchte unser Unternehmen die Öffentlichkeit über Art, Umfang und Zweck der von uns erhobenen, genutzten und verarbeiteten personenbezogenen Daten informieren. Ferner werden betroffene Personen mittels dieser Datenschutzerklärung über die ihnen zustehenden Rechte aufgeklärt.
Die A-Calc hat als für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlicher zahlreiche technische und organisatorische Maßnahmen umgesetzt, um einen möglichst lückenlosen Schutz der über diese Internetseite verarbeiteten personenbezogenen Daten sicherzustellen. Dennoch können Internetbasierte Datenübertragungen grundsätzlich Sicherheitslücken aufweisen, sodass ein absoluter Schutz nicht gewährleistet werden kann. Aus diesem Grund steht es jeder betroffenen Person frei, personenbezogene Daten auch auf alternativen Wegen, beispielsweise telefonisch, an uns zu übermitteln.
1. Begriffsbestimmungen
Die Datenschutzerklärung der A-Calc beruht auf den Begrifflichkeiten, die durch den Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber beim Erlass der Datenschutz-Grundverordnung (DS-GVO) verwendet wurden. Unsere Datenschutzerklärung soll sowohl für die Öffentlichkeit als auch für unsere Kunden und Geschäftspartner einfach lesbar und verständlich sein. Um dies zu gewährleisten, möchten wir vorab die verwendeten Begrifflichkeiten erläutern.
Wir verwenden in dieser Datenschutzerklärung unter anderem die folgenden Begriffe:
a)    personenbezogene Daten
Personenbezogene Daten sind alle Informationen, die sich auf eine identifizierte oder identifizierbare natürliche Person (im Folgenden „betroffene Person“) beziehen. Als identifizierbar wird eine natürliche Person angesehen, die direkt oder indirekt, insbesondere mittels Zuordnung zu einer Kennung wie einem Namen, zu einer Kennnummer, zu Standortdaten, zu einer Online-Kennung oder zu einem oder mehreren besonderen Merkmalen, die Ausdruck der physischen, physiologischen, genetischen, psychischen, wirtschaftlichen, kulturellen oder sozialen Identität dieser natürlichen Person sind, identifiziert werden kann.
b)    betroffene Person
Betroffene Person ist jede identifizierte oder identifizierbare natürliche Person, deren personenbezogene Daten von dem für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen verarbeitet werden.
c)    Verarbeitung
Verarbeitung ist jeder mit oder ohne Hilfe automatisierter Verfahren ausgeführte Vorgang oder jede solche Vorgangsreihe im Zusammenhang mit personenbezogenen Daten wie das Erheben, das Erfassen, die Organisation, das Ordnen, die Speicherung, die Anpassung oder Veränderung, das Auslesen, das Abfragen, die Verwendung, die Offenlegung durch Übermittlung, Verbreitung oder eine andere Form der Bereitstellung, den Abgleich oder die Verknüpfung, die Einschränkung, das Löschen oder die Vernichtung.
d)    Einschränkung der Verarbeitung
Einschränkung der Verarbeitung ist die Markierung gespeicherter personenbezogener Daten mit dem Ziel, ihre künftige Verarbeitung einzuschränken.
e)    Profiling
Profiling ist jede Art der automatisierten Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten, die darin besteht, dass diese personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden, um bestimmte persönliche Aspekte, die sich auf eine natürliche Person beziehen, zu bewerten, insbesondere, um Aspekte bezüglich Arbeitsleistung, wirtschaftlicher Lage, Gesundheit, persönlicher Vorlieben, Interessen, Zuverlässigkeit, Verhalten, Aufenthaltsort oder Ortswechsel dieser natürlichen Person zu analysieren oder vorherzusagen.
f)     Pseudonymisierung
Pseudonymisierung ist die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten in einer Weise, auf welche die personenbezogenen Daten ohne Hinzuziehung zusätzlicher Informationen nicht mehr einer spezifischen betroffenen Person zugeordnet werden können, sofern diese zusätzlichen Informationen gesondert aufbewahrt werden und technischen und organisatorischen Maßnahmen unterliegen, die gewährleisten, dass die personenbezogenen Daten nicht einer identifizierten oder identifizierbaren natürlichen Person zugewiesen werden.
g)    Verantwortlicher oder für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlicher
Verantwortlicher oder für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlicher ist die natürliche oder juristische Person, Behörde, Einrichtung oder andere Stelle, die allein oder gemeinsam mit anderen über die Zwecke und Mittel der Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten entscheidet. Sind die Zwecke und Mittel dieser Verarbeitung durch das Unionsrecht oder das Recht der Mitgliedstaaten vorgegeben, so kann der Verantwortliche beziehungsweise können die bestimmten Kriterien seiner Benennung nach dem Unionsrecht oder dem Recht der Mitgliedstaaten vorgesehen werden.
h)    Auftragsverarbeiter
Auftragsverarbeiter ist eine natürliche oder juristische Person, Behörde, Einrichtung oder andere Stelle, die personenbezogene Daten im Auftrag des Verantwortlichen verarbeitet.
i)      Empfänger
Empfänger ist eine natürliche oder juristische Person, Behörde, Einrichtung oder andere Stelle, der personenbezogene Daten offengelegt werden, unabhängig davon, ob es sich bei ihr um einen Dritten handelt oder nicht. Behörden, die im Rahmen eines bestimmten Untersuchungsauftrags nach dem Unionsrecht oder dem Recht der Mitgliedstaaten möglicherweise personenbezogene Daten erhalten, gelten jedoch nicht als Empfänger.
j)      Dritter
Dritter ist eine natürliche oder juristische Person, Behörde, Einrichtung oder andere Stelle außer der betroffenen Person, dem Verantwortlichen, dem Auftragsverarbeiter und den Personen, die unter der unmittelbaren Verantwortung des Verantwortlichen oder des Auftragsverarbeiters befugt sind, die personenbezogenen Daten zu verarbeiten.
k)    Einwilligung
Einwilligung ist jede von der betroffenen Person freiwillig für den bestimmten Fall in informierter Weise und unmissverständlich abgegebene Willensbekundung in Form einer Erklärung oder einer sonstigen eindeutigen bestätigenden Handlung, mit der die betroffene Person zu verstehen gibt, dass sie mit der Verarbeitung der sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten einverstanden ist.
2. Name und Anschrift des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen
Verantwortlicher im Sinne der Datenschutz-Grundverordnung, sonstiger in den Mitgliedstaaten der Europäischen Union geltenden Datenschutzgesetze und anderer Bestimmungen mit datenschutzrechtlichem Charakter ist die:
Project(fan-made): A-Calc Community Apps
Udo Schulz
c/o Schlunke
Potsdamer Str. 93a
14513 Teltow
Deutschland
E-Mail: privacy@a-calc.de
Website: https://www.a-calc.de
3. Cookies
Die Internetseiten der A-Calc verwenden Cookies. Cookies sind Textdateien, welche über einen Internetbrowser auf einem Computersystem abgelegt und gespeichert werden.
Zahlreiche Internetseiten und Server verwenden Cookies. Viele Cookies enthalten eine sogenannte Cookie-ID. Eine Cookie-ID ist eine eindeutige Kennung des Cookies. Sie besteht aus einer Zeichenfolge, durch welche Internetseiten und Server dem konkreten Internetbrowser zugeordnet werden können, in dem das Cookie gespeichert wurde. Dies ermöglicht es den besuchten Internetseiten und Servern, den individuellen Browser der betroffenen Person von anderen Internetbrowsern, die andere Cookies enthalten, zu unterscheiden. Ein bestimmter Internetbrowser kann über die eindeutige Cookie-ID wiedererkannt und identifiziert werden.
Durch den Einsatz von Cookies kann die A-Calc den Nutzern dieser Internetseite nutzerfreundlichere Services bereitstellen, die ohne die Cookie-Setzung nicht möglich wären.
Mittels eines Cookies können die Informationen und Angebote auf unserer Internetseite im Sinne des Benutzers optimiert werden. Cookies ermöglichen uns, wie bereits erwähnt, die Benutzer unserer Internetseite wiederzuerkennen. Zweck dieser Wiedererkennung ist es, den Nutzern die Verwendung unserer Internetseite zu erleichtern. Der Benutzer einer Internetseite, die Cookies verwendet, muss beispielsweise nicht bei jedem Besuch der Internetseite erneut seine Zugangsdaten eingeben, weil dies von der Internetseite und dem auf dem Computersystem des Benutzers abgelegten Cookie übernommen wird. Ein weiteres Beispiel ist das Cookie eines Warenkorbes im Online-Shop. Der Online-Shop merkt sich die Artikel, die ein Kunde in den virtuellen Warenkorb gelegt hat, über ein Cookie.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Ferner können bereits gesetzte Cookies jederzeit über einen Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden. Dies ist in allen gängigen Internetbrowsern möglich. Deaktiviert die betroffene Person die Setzung von Cookies in dem genutzten Internetbrowser, sind unter Umständen nicht alle Funktionen unserer Internetseite vollumfänglich nutzbar.
4. Erfassung von allgemeinen Daten und Informationen
Die Internetseite der A-Calc erfasst mit jedem Aufruf der Internetseite durch eine betroffene Person oder ein automatisiertes System eine Reihe von allgemeinen Daten und Informationen. Diese allgemeinen Daten und Informationen werden in den Logfiles des Servers gespeichert. Erfasst werden können die (1) verwendeten Browsertypen und Versionen, (2) das vom zugreifenden System verwendete Betriebssystem, (3) die Internetseite, von welcher ein zugreifendes System auf unsere Internetseite gelangt (sogenannte Referrer), (4) die Unterwebseiten, welche über ein zugreifendes System auf unserer Internetseite angesteuert werden, (5) das Datum und die Uhrzeit eines Zugriffs auf die Internetseite, (6) eine Internet-Protokoll-Adresse (IP-Adresse), (7) der Internet-Service-Provider des zugreifenden Systems und (8) sonstige ähnliche Daten und Informationen, die der Gefahrenabwehr im Falle von Angriffen auf unsere informationstechnologischen Systeme dienen.
Bei der Nutzung dieser allgemeinen Daten und Informationen zieht die A-Calc keine Rückschlüsse auf die betroffene Person. Diese Informationen werden vielmehr benötigt, um (1) die Inhalte unserer Internetseite korrekt auszuliefern, (2) die Inhalte unserer Internetseite sowie die Werbung für diese zu optimieren, (3) die dauerhafte Funktionsfähigkeit unserer informationstechnologischen Systeme und der Technik unserer Internetseite zu gewährleisten sowie (4) um Strafverfolgungsbehörden im Falle eines Cyberangriffes die zur Strafverfolgung notwendigen Informationen bereitzustellen. Diese anonym erhobenen Daten und Informationen werden durch die A-Calc daher einerseits statistisch und ferner mit dem Ziel ausgewertet, den Datenschutz und die Datensicherheit in unserem Unternehmen zu erhöhen, um letztlich ein optimales Schutzniveau für die von uns verarbeiteten personenbezogenen Daten sicherzustellen. Die anonymen Daten der Server-Logfiles werden getrennt von allen durch eine betroffene Person angegebenen personenbezogenen Daten gespeichert.
5. Kontaktmöglichkeit über die Internetseite
Die Internetseite der A-Calc enthält aufgrund von gesetzlichen Vorschriften Angaben, die eine schnelle elektronische Kontaktaufnahme zu unserem Unternehmen sowie eine unmittelbare Kommunikation mit uns ermöglichen, was ebenfalls eine allgemeine Adresse der sogenannten elektronischen Post (E-Mail-Adresse) umfasst. Sofern eine betroffene Person per E-Mail oder über ein Kontaktformular den Kontakt mit dem für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen aufnimmt, werden die von der betroffenen Person übermittelten personenbezogenen Daten automatisch gespeichert. Solche auf freiwilliger Basis von einer betroffenen Person an den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen übermittelten personenbezogenen Daten werden für Zwecke der Bearbeitung oder der Kontaktaufnahme zur betroffenen Person gespeichert. Es erfolgt keine Weitergabe dieser personenbezogenen Daten an Dritte.
6. Routinemäßige Löschung und Sperrung von personenbezogenen Daten
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche verarbeitet und speichert personenbezogene Daten der betroffenen Person nur für den Zeitraum, der zur Erreichung des Speicherungszwecks erforderlich ist oder sofern dies durch den Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber oder einen anderen Gesetzgeber in Gesetzen oder Vorschriften, welchen der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche unterliegt, vorgesehen wurde.
Entfällt der Speicherungszweck oder läuft eine vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber oder einem anderen zuständigen Gesetzgeber vorgeschriebene Speicherfrist ab, werden die personenbezogenen Daten routinemäßig und entsprechend den gesetzlichen Vorschriften gesperrt oder gelöscht.
7. Rechte der betroffenen Person
a)    Recht auf Bestätigung
Jede betroffene Person hat das vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber eingeräumte Recht, von dem für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen eine Bestätigung darüber zu verlangen, ob sie betreffende personenbezogene Daten verarbeitet werden. Möchte eine betroffene Person dieses Bestätigungsrecht in Anspruch nehmen, kann sie sich hierzu jederzeit an einen Mitarbeiter des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen wenden.
b)    Recht auf Auskunft
Jede von der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten betroffene Person hat das vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber gewährte Recht, jederzeit von dem für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen unentgeltliche Auskunft über die zu seiner Person gespeicherten personenbezogenen Daten und eine Kopie dieser Auskunft zu erhalten. Ferner hat der Europäische Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber der betroffenen Person Auskunft über folgende Informationen zugestanden:
die Verarbeitungszwecke
die Kategorien personenbezogener Daten, die verarbeitet werden
die Empfänger oder Kategorien von Empfängern, gegenüber denen die personenbezogenen Daten offengelegt worden sind oder noch offengelegt werden, insbesondere bei Empfängern in Drittländern oder bei internationalen Organisationen
falls möglich die geplante Dauer, für die die personenbezogenen Daten gespeichert werden, oder, falls dies nicht möglich ist, die Kriterien für die Festlegung dieser Dauer
das Bestehen eines Rechts auf Berichtigung oder Löschung der sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten oder auf Einschränkung der Verarbeitung durch den Verantwortlichen oder eines Widerspruchsrechts gegen diese Verarbeitung
das Bestehen eines Beschwerderechts bei einer Aufsichtsbehörde
wenn die personenbezogenen Daten nicht bei der betroffenen Person erhoben werden: Alle verfügbaren Informationen über die Herkunft der Daten
das Bestehen einer automatisierten Entscheidungsfindung einschließlich Profiling gemäß Artikel 22 Abs.1 und 4 DS-GVO und — zumindest in diesen Fällen — aussagekräftige Informationen über die involvierte Logik sowie die Tragweite und die angestrebten Auswirkungen einer derartigen Verarbeitung für die betroffene Person
Ferner steht der betroffenen Person ein Auskunftsrecht darüber zu, ob personenbezogene Daten an ein Drittland oder an eine internationale Organisation übermittelt wurden. Sofern dies der Fall ist, so steht der betroffenen Person im Übrigen das Recht zu, Auskunft über die geeigneten Garantien im Zusammenhang mit der Übermittlung zu erhalten.
Möchte eine betroffene Person dieses Auskunftsrecht in Anspruch nehmen, kann sie sich hierzu jederzeit an einen Mitarbeiter des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen wenden.
c)    Recht auf Berichtigung
Jede von der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten betroffene Person hat das vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber gewährte Recht, die unverzügliche Berichtigung sie betreffender unrichtiger personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen. Ferner steht der betroffenen Person das Recht zu, unter Berücksichtigung der Zwecke der Verarbeitung, die Vervollständigung unvollständiger personenbezogener Daten — auch mittels einer ergänzenden Erklärung — zu verlangen.
Möchte eine betroffene Person dieses Berichtigungsrecht in Anspruch nehmen, kann sie sich hierzu jederzeit an einen Mitarbeiter des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen wenden.
d)    Recht auf Löschung (Recht auf Vergessen werden)
Jede von der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten betroffene Person hat das vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber gewährte Recht, von dem Verantwortlichen zu verlangen, dass die sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten unverzüglich gelöscht werden, sofern einer der folgenden Gründe zutrifft und soweit die Verarbeitung nicht erforderlich ist:
Die personenbezogenen Daten wurden für solche Zwecke erhoben oder auf sonstige Weise verarbeitet, für welche sie nicht mehr notwendig sind.
Die betroffene Person widerruft ihre Einwilligung, auf die sich die Verarbeitung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 Buchstabe a DS-GVO oder Art. 9 Abs. 2 Buchstabe a DS-GVO stützte, und es fehlt an einer anderweitigen Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung.
Die betroffene Person legt gemäß Art. 21 Abs. 1 DS-GVO Widerspruch gegen die Verarbeitung ein, und es liegen keine vorrangigen berechtigten Gründe für die Verarbeitung vor, oder die betroffene Person legt gemäß Art. 21 Abs. 2 DS-GVO Widerspruch gegen die Verarbeitung ein.
Die personenbezogenen Daten wurden unrechtmäßig verarbeitet.
Die Löschung der personenbezogenen Daten ist zur Erfüllung einer rechtlichen Verpflichtung nach dem Unionsrecht oder dem Recht der Mitgliedstaaten erforderlich, dem der Verantwortliche unterliegt.
Die personenbezogenen Daten wurden in Bezug auf angebotene Dienste der Informationsgesellschaft gemäß Art. 8 Abs. 1 DS-GVO erhoben.
Sofern einer der oben genannten Gründe zutrifft und eine betroffene Person die Löschung von personenbezogenen Daten, die bei der A-Calc gespeichert sind, veranlassen möchte, kann sie sich hierzu jederzeit an einen Mitarbeiter des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen wenden. Der Mitarbeiter der A-Calc wird veranlassen, dass dem Löschverlangen unverzüglich nachgekommen wird.
Wurden die personenbezogenen Daten von der A-Calc öffentlich gemacht und ist unser Unternehmen als Verantwortlicher gemäß Art. 17 Abs. 1 DS-GVO zur Löschung der personenbezogenen Daten verpflichtet, so trifft die A-Calc unter Berücksichtigung der verfügbaren Technologie und der Implementierungskosten angemessene Maßnahmen, auch technischer Art, um andere für die Datenverarbeitung Verantwortliche, welche die veröffentlichten personenbezogenen Daten verarbeiten, darüber in Kenntnis zu setzen, dass die betroffene Person von diesen anderen für die Datenverarbeitung Verantwortlichen die Löschung sämtlicher Links zu diesen personenbezogenen Daten oder von Kopien oder Replikationen dieser personenbezogenen Daten verlangt hat, soweit die Verarbeitung nicht erforderlich ist. Der Mitarbeiter der A-Calc wird im Einzelfall das Notwendige veranlassen.
e)    Recht auf Einschränkung der Verarbeitung
Jede von der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten betroffene Person hat das vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber gewährte Recht, von dem Verantwortlichen die Einschränkung der Verarbeitung zu verlangen, wenn eine der folgenden Voraussetzungen gegeben ist:
Die Richtigkeit der personenbezogenen Daten wird von der betroffenen Person bestritten, und zwar für eine Dauer, die es dem Verantwortlichen ermöglicht, die Richtigkeit der personenbezogenen Daten zu überprüfen.
Die Verarbeitung ist unrechtmäßig, die betroffene Person lehnt die Löschung der personenbezogenen Daten ab und verlangt stattdessen die Einschränkung der Nutzung der personenbezogenen Daten.
Der Verantwortliche benötigt die personenbezogenen Daten für die Zwecke der Verarbeitung nicht länger, die betroffene Person benötigt sie jedoch zur Geltendmachung, Ausübung oder Verteidigung von Rechtsansprüchen.
Die betroffene Person hat Widerspruch gegen die Verarbeitung gem. Art. 21 Abs. 1 DS-GVO eingelegt und es steht noch nicht fest, ob die berechtigten Gründe des Verantwortlichen gegenüber denen der betroffenen Person überwiegen.
Sofern eine der oben genannten Voraussetzungen gegeben ist und eine betroffene Person die Einschränkung von personenbezogenen Daten, die bei der A-Calc gespeichert sind, verlangen möchte, kann sie sich hierzu jederzeit an einen Mitarbeiter des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen wenden. Der Mitarbeiter der A-Calc wird die Einschränkung der Verarbeitung veranlassen.
f)     Recht auf Datenübertragbarkeit
Jede von der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten betroffene Person hat das vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber gewährte Recht, die sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten, welche durch die betroffene Person einem Verantwortlichen bereitgestellt wurden, in einem strukturierten, gängigen und maschinenlesbaren Format zu erhalten. Sie hat außerdem das Recht, diese Daten einem anderen Verantwortlichen ohne Behinderung durch den Verantwortlichen, dem die personenbezogenen Daten bereitgestellt wurden, zu übermitteln, sofern die Verarbeitung auf der Einwilligung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 Buchstabe a DS-GVO oder Art. 9 Abs. 2 Buchstabe a DS-GVO oder auf einem Vertrag gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 Buchstabe b DS-GVO beruht und die Verarbeitung mithilfe automatisierter Verfahren erfolgt, sofern die Verarbeitung nicht für die Wahrnehmung einer Aufgabe erforderlich ist, die im öffentlichen Interesse liegt oder in Ausübung öffentlicher Gewalt erfolgt, welche dem Verantwortlichen übertragen wurde.
Ferner hat die betroffene Person bei der Ausübung ihres Rechts auf Datenübertragbarkeit gemäß Art. 20 Abs. 1 DS-GVO das Recht, zu erwirken, dass die personenbezogenen Daten direkt von einem Verantwortlichen an einen anderen Verantwortlichen übermittelt werden, soweit dies technisch machbar ist und sofern hiervon nicht die Rechte und Freiheiten anderer Personen beeinträchtigt werden.
Zur Geltendmachung des Rechts auf Datenübertragbarkeit kann sich die betroffene Person jederzeit an einen Mitarbeiter der A-Calc wenden.
g)    Recht auf Widerspruch
Jede von der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten betroffene Person hat das vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber gewährte Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus ihrer besonderen Situation ergeben, jederzeit gegen die Verarbeitung sie betreffender personenbezogener Daten, die aufgrund von Art. 6 Abs. 1 Buchstaben e oder f DS-GVO erfolgt, Widerspruch einzulegen. Dies gilt auch für ein auf diese Bestimmungen gestütztes Profiling.
Die A-Calc verarbeitet die personenbezogenen Daten im Falle des Widerspruchs nicht mehr, es sei denn, wir können zwingende schutzwürdige Gründe für die Verarbeitung nachweisen, die den Interessen, Rechten und Freiheiten der betroffenen Person überwiegen, oder die Verarbeitung dient der Geltendmachung, Ausübung oder Verteidigung von Rechtsansprüchen.
Verarbeitet die A-Calc personenbezogene Daten, um Direktwerbung zu betreiben, so hat die betroffene Person das Recht, jederzeit Widerspruch gegen die Verarbeitung der personenbezogenen Daten zum Zwecke derartiger Werbung einzulegen. Dies gilt auch für das Profiling, soweit es mit solcher Direktwerbung in Verbindung steht. Widerspricht die betroffene Person gegenüber der A-Calc der Verarbeitung für Zwecke der Direktwerbung, so wird die A-Calc die personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr für diese Zwecke verarbeiten.
Zudem hat die betroffene Person das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus ihrer besonderen Situation ergeben, gegen die sie betreffende Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten, die bei der A-Calc zu wissenschaftlichen oder historischen Forschungszwecken oder zu statistischen Zwecken gemäß Art. 89 Abs. 1 DS-GVO erfolgen, Widerspruch einzulegen, es sei denn, eine solche Verarbeitung ist zur Erfüllung einer im öffentlichen Interesse liegenden Aufgabe erforderlich.
Zur Ausübung des Rechts auf Widerspruch kann sich die betroffene Person direkt an jeden Mitarbeiter der A-Calc oder einen anderen Mitarbeiter wenden. Der betroffenen Person steht es ferner frei, im Zusammenhang mit der Nutzung von Diensten der Informationsgesellschaft, ungeachtet der Richtlinie 2002/58/EG, ihr Widerspruchsrecht mittels automatisierter Verfahren auszuüben, bei denen technische Spezifikationen verwendet werden.
h)    Automatisierte Entscheidungen im Einzelfall einschließlich Profiling
Jede von der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten betroffene Person hat das vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber gewährte Recht, nicht einer ausschließlich auf einer automatisierten Verarbeitung — einschließlich Profiling — beruhenden Entscheidung unterworfen zu werden, die ihr gegenüber rechtliche Wirkung entfaltet oder sie in ähnlicher Weise erheblich beeinträchtigt, sofern die Entscheidung (1) nicht für den Abschluss oder die Erfüllung eines Vertrags zwischen der betroffenen Person und dem Verantwortlichen erforderlich ist, oder (2) aufgrund von Rechtsvorschriften der Union oder der Mitgliedstaaten, denen der Verantwortliche unterliegt, zulässig ist und diese Rechtsvorschriften angemessene Maßnahmen zur Wahrung der Rechte und Freiheiten sowie der berechtigten Interessen der betroffenen Person enthalten oder (3) mit ausdrücklicher Einwilligung der betroffenen Person erfolgt.
Ist die Entscheidung (1) für den Abschluss oder die Erfüllung eines Vertrags zwischen der betroffenen Person und dem Verantwortlichen erforderlich oder (2) erfolgt sie mit ausdrücklicher Einwilligung der betroffenen Person, trifft die A-Calc angemessene Maßnahmen, um die Rechte und Freiheiten sowie die berechtigten Interessen der betroffenen Person zu wahren, wozu mindestens das Recht auf Erwirkung des Eingreifens einer Person seitens des Verantwortlichen, auf Darlegung des eigenen Standpunkts und auf Anfechtung der Entscheidung gehört.
Möchte die betroffene Person Rechte mit Bezug auf automatisierte Entscheidungen geltend machen, kann sie sich hierzu jederzeit an einen Mitarbeiter des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen wenden.
i)      Recht auf Widerruf einer datenschutzrechtlichen Einwilligung
Jede von der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten betroffene Person hat das vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber gewährte Recht, eine Einwilligung zur Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten jederzeit zu widerrufen.
Möchte die betroffene Person ihr Recht auf Widerruf einer Einwilligung geltend machen, kann sie sich hierzu jederzeit an einen Mitarbeiter des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen wenden.
8. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Facebook
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten des Unternehmens Facebook integriert. Facebook ist ein soziales Netzwerk.
Ein soziales Netzwerk ist ein im Internet betriebener sozialer Treffpunkt, eine Online-Gemeinschaft, die es den Nutzern in der Regel ermöglicht, untereinander zu kommunizieren und im virtuellen Raum zu interagieren. Ein soziales Netzwerk kann als Plattform zum Austausch von Meinungen und Erfahrungen dienen oder ermöglicht es der Internetgemeinschaft, persönliche oder unternehmensbezogene Informationen bereitzustellen. Facebook ermöglicht den Nutzern des sozialen Netzwerkes unter anderem die Erstellung von privaten Profilen, den Upload von Fotos und eine Vernetzung über Freundschaftsanfragen.
Betreibergesellschaft von Facebook ist die Facebook, Inc., 1 Hacker Way, Menlo Park, CA 94025, USA. Für die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten Verantwortlicher ist, wenn eine betroffene Person außerhalb der USA oder Kanada lebt, die Facebook Ireland Ltd., 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland.
Durch jeden Aufruf einer der Einzelseiten dieser Internetseite, die durch den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen betrieben wird und auf welcher eine Facebook-Komponente (Facebook-Plug-In) integriert wurde, wird der Internetbrowser auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person automatisch durch die jeweilige Facebook-Komponente veranlasst, eine Darstellung der entsprechenden Facebook-Komponente von Facebook herunterzuladen. Eine Gesamtübersicht über alle Facebook-Plug-Ins kann unter https://developers.facebook.com/docs/plugins/?locale=de_DE abgerufen werden. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhält Facebook Kenntnis darüber, welche konkrete Unterseite unserer Internetseite durch die betroffene Person besucht wird.
Sofern die betroffene Person gleichzeitig bei Facebook eingeloggt ist, erkennt Facebook mit jedem Aufruf unserer Internetseite durch die betroffene Person und während der gesamten Dauer des jeweiligen Aufenthaltes auf unserer Internetseite, welche konkrete Unterseite unserer Internetseite die betroffene Person besucht. Diese Informationen werden durch die Facebook-Komponente gesammelt und durch Facebook dem jeweiligen Facebook-Account der betroffenen Person zugeordnet. Betätigt die betroffene Person einen der auf unserer Internetseite integrierten Facebook-Buttons, beispielsweise den „Gefällt mir“-Button, oder gibt die betroffene Person einen Kommentar ab, ordnet Facebook diese Information dem persönlichen Facebook-Benutzerkonto der betroffenen Person zu und speichert diese personenbezogenen Daten.
Facebook erhält über die Facebook-Komponente immer dann eine Information darüber, dass die betroffene Person unsere Internetseite besucht hat, wenn die betroffene Person zum Zeitpunkt des Aufrufs unserer Internetseite gleichzeitig bei Facebook eingeloggt ist; dies findet unabhängig davon statt, ob die betroffene Person die Facebook-Komponente anklickt oder nicht. Ist eine derartige Übermittlung dieser Informationen an Facebook von der betroffenen Person nicht gewollt, kann diese die Übermittlung dadurch verhindern, dass sie sich vor einem Aufruf unserer Internetseite aus ihrem Facebook-Account ausloggt.
Die von Facebook veröffentlichte Datenrichtlinie, die unter https://de-de.facebook.com/about/privacy/ abrufbar ist, gibt Aufschluss über die Erhebung, Verarbeitung und Nutzung personenbezogener Daten durch Facebook. Ferner wird dort erläutert, welche Einstellungsmöglichkeiten Facebook zum Schutz der Privatsphäre der betroffenen Person bietet. Zudem sind unterschiedliche Applikationen erhältlich, die es ermöglichen, eine Datenübermittlung an Facebook zu unterdrücken. Solche Applikationen können durch die betroffene Person genutzt werden, um eine Datenübermittlung an Facebook zu unterdrücken.
9. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Funktionen des Amazon-Partnerprogramms
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat als Teilnehmer des Amazon-Partnerprogramms auf dieser Internetseite Amazon-Komponenten integriert. Die Amazon-Komponenten wurden von Amazon mit dem Ziel konzipiert, Kunden über Werbeanzeigen auf unterschiedliche Internetseiten der Amazon-Gruppe, insbesondere auf Amazon.co.uk, Local.Amazon.co.uk, Amazon.de, BuyVIP.com, Amazon.fr, Amazon.it und Amazon.es. BuyVIP.com gegen Zahlung einer Provision zu vermitteln. Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche kann durch die Nutzung der Amazon-Komponenten Werbeeinnahmen generieren.
Betreibergesellschaft dieser Amazon-Komponenten ist die Amazon EU S.à.r.l, 5 Rue Plaetis, L-2338 Luxembourg, Luxemburg.
Amazon setzt ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Durch jeden einzelnen Aufruf einer der Einzelseiten dieser Internetseite, die durch den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen betrieben wird und auf welcher eine Amazon-Komponente integriert wurde, wird der Internetbrowser auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person automatisch durch die jeweilige Amazon-Komponente veranlasst, Daten zum Zwecke der Online-Werbung und der Abrechnung von Provisionen an Amazon zu übermitteln. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhält Amazon Kenntnis über personenbezogene Daten, die Amazon dazu dienen, die Herkunft von bei Amazon eingehenden Bestellungen nachzuvollziehen und in der Folge eine Provisionsabrechnung zu ermöglichen. Amazon kann unter anderem nachvollziehen, dass die betroffene Person einen Partnerlink auf unserer Internetseite angeklickt hat.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass Amazon ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem können von Amazon bereits gesetzte Cookies jederzeit über einen Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Weitere Informationen und die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von Amazon können unter https://www.amazon.de/gp/help/customer/display.html?nodeId=3312401 abgerufen werden.
10. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Google AdSense
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Google AdSense integriert. Google AdSense ist ein Online-Dienst, über welchen eine Vermittlung von Werbung auf Drittseiten ermöglicht wird. Google AdSense beruht auf einem Algorithmus, welcher die auf Drittseiten angezeigten Werbeanzeigen passend zu den Inhalten der jeweiligen Drittseite auswählt. Google AdSense gestattet ein interessenbezogenes Targeting des Internetnutzers, welches mittels Generierung von individuellen Benutzerprofilen umgesetzt wird.
Betreibergesellschaft der Google-AdSense-Komponente ist die Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
Der Zweck der Google-AdSense-Komponente ist die Einbindung von Werbeanzeigen auf unserer Internetseite. Google-AdSense setzt ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Mit der Setzung des Cookies wird der Alphabet Inc. eine Analyse der Benutzung unserer Internetseite ermöglicht. Durch jeden Aufruf einer der Einzelseiten dieser Internetseite, die durch den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen betrieben wird und auf welcher eine Google-AdSense-Komponente integriert wurde, wird der Internetbrowser auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person automatisch durch die jeweilige Google-AdSense-Komponente veranlasst, Daten zum Zwecke der Online-Werbung und der Abrechnung von Provisionen an die Alphabet Inc. zu übermitteln. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhält die Alphabet Inc. Kenntnis über personenbezogene Daten, wie der IP-Adresse der betroffenen Person, die der Alphabet Inc. unter anderem dazu dienen, die Herkunft der Besucher und Klicks nachzuvollziehen und in der Folge Provisionsabrechnungen zu ermöglichen.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass die Alphabet Inc. ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem kann ein von der Alphabet Inc. bereits gesetzter Cookie jederzeit über den Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Google AdSense verwendet zudem sogenannte Zählpixel. Ein Zählpixel ist eine Miniaturgrafik, die in Internetseiten eingebettet wird, um eine Logdatei-Aufzeichnung und eine Logdatei-Analyse zu ermöglichen, wodurch eine statistische Auswertung durchgeführt werden kann. Anhand des eingebetteten Zählpixels kann die Alphabet Inc. erkennen, ob und wann eine Internetseite von einer betroffenen Person geöffnet wurde und welche Links von der betroffenen Person angeklickt wurden. Zählpixel dienen unter anderem dazu, den Besucherfluss einer Internetseite auszuwerten.
Über Google AdSense werden personenbezogene Daten und Informationen, was auch die IP-Adresse umfasst und zur Erfassung und Abrechnung der angezeigten Werbeanzeigen notwendig ist, an die Alphabet Inc. in die Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika übertragen. Diese personenbezogenen Daten werden in den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika gespeichert und verarbeitet. Die Alphabet Inc. gibt diese über das technische Verfahren erhobenen personenbezogenen Daten unter Umständen an Dritte weiter.
Google-AdSense wird unter diesem Link https://www.google.de/intl/de/adsense/start/ genauer erläutert.
11. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Google Analytics (mit Anonymisierungsfunktion)
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite die Komponente Google Analytics (mit Anonymisierungsfunktion) integriert. Google Analytics ist ein Web-Analyse-Dienst. Web-Analyse ist die Erhebung, Sammlung und Auswertung von Daten über das Verhalten von Besuchern von Internetseiten. Ein Web-Analyse-Dienst erfasst unter anderem Daten darüber, von welcher Internetseite eine betroffene Person auf eine Internetseite gekommen ist (sogenannte Referrer), auf welche Unterseiten der Internetseite zugegriffen oder wie oft und für welche Verweildauer eine Unterseite betrachtet wurde. Eine Web-Analyse wird überwiegend zur Optimierung einer Internetseite und zur Kosten-Nutzen-Analyse von Internetwerbung eingesetzt.
Betreibergesellschaft der Google-Analytics-Komponente ist die Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche verwendet für die Web-Analyse über Google Analytics den Zusatz "_gat._anonymizeIp". Mittels dieses Zusatzes wird die IP-Adresse des Internetanschlusses der betroffenen Person von Google gekürzt und anonymisiert, wenn der Zugriff auf unsere Internetseiten aus einem Mitgliedstaat der Europäischen Union oder aus einem anderen Vertragsstaat des Abkommens über den Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum erfolgt.
Der Zweck der Google-Analytics-Komponente ist die Analyse der Besucherströme auf unserer Internetseite. Google nutzt die gewonnenen Daten und Informationen unter anderem dazu, die Nutzung unserer Internetseite auszuwerten, um für uns Online-Reports, welche die Aktivitäten auf unseren Internetseiten aufzeigen, zusammenzustellen, und um weitere mit der Nutzung unserer Internetseite in Verbindung stehende Dienstleistungen zu erbringen.
Google Analytics setzt ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Mit Setzung des Cookies wird Google eine Analyse der Benutzung unserer Internetseite ermöglicht. Durch jeden Aufruf einer der Einzelseiten dieser Internetseite, die durch den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen betrieben wird und auf welcher eine Google-Analytics-Komponente integriert wurde, wird der Internetbrowser auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person automatisch durch die jeweilige Google-Analytics-Komponente veranlasst, Daten zum Zwecke der Online-Analyse an Google zu übermitteln. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhält Google Kenntnis über personenbezogene Daten, wie der IP-Adresse der betroffenen Person, die Google unter anderem dazu dienen, die Herkunft der Besucher und Klicks nachzuvollziehen und in der Folge Provisionsabrechnungen zu ermöglichen.
Mittels des Cookies werden personenbezogene Informationen, beispielsweise die Zugriffszeit, der Ort, von welchem ein Zugriff ausging und die Häufigkeit der Besuche unserer Internetseite durch die betroffene Person, gespeichert. Bei jedem Besuch unserer Internetseiten werden diese personenbezogenen Daten, einschließlich der IP-Adresse des von der betroffenen Person genutzten Internetanschlusses, an Google in den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika übertragen. Diese personenbezogenen Daten werden durch Google in den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika gespeichert. Google gibt diese über das technische Verfahren erhobenen personenbezogenen Daten unter Umständen an Dritte weiter.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass Google ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem kann ein von Google Analytics bereits gesetzter Cookie jederzeit über den Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Ferner besteht für die betroffene Person die Möglichkeit, einer Erfassung der durch Google Analytics erzeugten, auf eine Nutzung dieser Internetseite bezogenen Daten sowie der Verarbeitung dieser Daten durch Google zu widersprechen und eine solche zu verhindern. Hierzu muss die betroffene Person ein Browser-Add-On unter dem Link https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout herunterladen und installieren. Dieses Browser-Add-On teilt Google Analytics über JavaScript mit, dass keine Daten und Informationen zu den Besuchen von Internetseiten an Google Analytics übermittelt werden dürfen. Die Installation des Browser-Add-Ons wird von Google als Widerspruch gewertet. Wird das informationstechnologische System der betroffenen Person zu einem späteren Zeitpunkt gelöscht, formatiert oder neu installiert, muss durch die betroffene Person eine erneute Installation des Browser-Add-Ons erfolgen, um Google Analytics zu deaktivieren. Sofern das Browser-Add-On durch die betroffene Person oder einer anderen Person, die ihrem Machtbereich zuzurechnen ist, deinstalliert oder deaktiviert wird, besteht die Möglichkeit der Neuinstallation oder der erneuten Aktivierung des Browser-Add-Ons.
Weitere Informationen und die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von Google können unter https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/privacy/ und unter http://www.google.com/analytics/terms/de.html abgerufen werden. Google Analytics wird unter diesem Link https://www.google.com/intl/de_de/analytics/ genauer erläutert.
12. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Google Remarketing
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Dienste von Google Remarketing integriert. Google Remarketing ist eine Funktion von Google-AdWords, die es einem Unternehmen ermöglicht, bei solchen Internetnutzern Werbung einblenden zu lassen, die sich zuvor auf der Internetseite des Unternehmens aufgehalten haben. Die Integration von Google Remarketing gestattet es einem Unternehmen demnach, nutzerbezogene Werbung zu erstellen und dem Internetnutzer folglich interessenrelevante Werbeanzeigen anzeigen zu lassen.
Betreibergesellschaft der Dienste von Google Remarketing ist die Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
Zweck von Google Remarketing ist die Einblendung von interessenrelevanter Werbung. Google Remarketing ermöglicht es uns, Werbeanzeigen über das Google-Werbenetzwerk anzuzeigen oder auf anderen Internetseiten anzeigen zu lassen, welche auf die individuellen Bedürfnisse und Interessen von Internetnutzern abgestimmt sind.
Google Remarketing setzt ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Mit der Setzung des Cookies wird Google eine Wiedererkennung des Besuchers unserer Internetseite ermöglicht, wenn dieser in der Folge Internetseiten aufruft, die ebenfalls Mitglied des Google-Werbenetzwerks sind. Mit jedem Aufruf einer Internetseite, auf welcher der Dienst von Google Remarketing integriert wurde, identifiziert sich der Internetbrowser der betroffenen Person automatisch bei Google. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhält Google Kenntnis über personenbezogene Daten, wie der IP-Adresse oder des Surfverhaltens des Nutzers, welche Google unter anderem zur Einblendung interessenrelevanter Werbung verwendet.
Mittels des Cookies werden personenbezogene Informationen, beispielsweise die durch die betroffene Person besuchten Internetseiten, gespeichert. Bei jedem Besuch unserer Internetseiten werden demnach personenbezogene Daten, einschließlich der IP-Adresse des von der betroffenen Person genutzten Internetanschlusses, an Google in den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika übertragen. Diese personenbezogenen Daten werden durch Google in den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika gespeichert. Google gibt diese über das technische Verfahren erhobenen personenbezogenen Daten unter Umständen an Dritte weiter.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass Google ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem kann ein von Google Analytics bereits gesetzter Cookie jederzeit über den Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Ferner besteht für die betroffene Person die Möglichkeit, der interessenbezogenen Werbung durch Google zu widersprechen. Hierzu muss die betroffene Person von jedem der von ihr genutzten Internetbrowser aus den Link www.google.de/settings/ads aufrufen und dort die gewünschten Einstellungen vornehmen.
Weitere Informationen und die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von Google können unter https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/privacy/ abgerufen werden.
13. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Google+
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite als Komponente die Google+ Schaltfläche integriert. Google+ ist ein sogenanntes soziales Netzwerk. Ein soziales Netzwerk ist ein im Internet betriebener sozialer Treffpunkt, eine Online-Gemeinschaft, die es den Nutzern in der Regel ermöglicht, untereinander zu kommunizieren und im virtuellen Raum zu interagieren. Ein soziales Netzwerk kann als Plattform zum Austausch von Meinungen und Erfahrungen dienen oder ermöglicht es der Internetgemeinschaft, persönliche oder unternehmensbezogene Informationen bereitzustellen. Google+ ermöglicht den Nutzern des sozialen Netzwerkes unter anderem die Erstellung von privaten Profilen, den Upload von Fotos und eine Vernetzung über Freundschaftsanfragen.
Betreibergesellschaft von Google+ ist die Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
Durch jeden Aufruf einer der Einzelseiten dieser Internetseite, die durch den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen betrieben wird und auf welcher eine Google+ Schaltfläche integriert wurde, wird der Internetbrowser auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person automatisch durch die jeweilige Google+ Schaltfläche veranlasst, eine Darstellung der entsprechenden Google+ Schaltfläche von Google herunterzuladen. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhält Google Kenntnis darüber, welche konkrete Unterseite unserer Internetseite durch die betroffene Person besucht wird. Genauere Informationen zu Google+ sind unter https://developers.google.com/+/ abrufbar.
Sofern die betroffene Person gleichzeitig bei Google+ eingeloggt ist, erkennt Google mit jedem Aufruf unserer Internetseite durch die betroffene Person und während der gesamten Dauer des jeweiligen Aufenthaltes auf unserer Internetseite, welche konkrete Unterseite unserer Internetseite die betroffene Person besucht. Diese Informationen werden durch die Google+ Schaltfläche gesammelt und durch Google dem jeweiligen Google+-Account der betroffenen Person zugeordnet.
Betätigt die betroffene Person einen der auf unserer Internetseite integrierten Google+-Buttons und gibt damit eine Google+1 Empfehlung ab, ordnet Google diese Information dem persönlichen Google+-Benutzerkonto der betroffenen Person zu und speichert diese personenbezogenen Daten. Google speichert die Google+1-Empfehlung der betroffenen Person und macht diese in Übereinstimmung mit den von der betroffenen Person diesbezüglich akzeptierten Bedingungen öffentlich zugänglich. Eine von der betroffenen Person auf dieser Internetseite abgegebene Google+1-Empfehlung wird in der Folge zusammen mit anderen personenbezogenen Daten, wie dem Namen des von der betroffenen Person genutzten Google+1-Accounts und dem in diesem hinterlegten Foto in anderen Google-Diensten, beispielsweise den Suchmaschinenergebnissen der Google-Suchmaschine, dem Google-Konto der betroffenen Person oder an sonstigen Stellen, beispielsweise auf Internetseiten oder im Zusammenhang mit Werbeanzeigen, gespeichert und verarbeitet. Ferner ist Google in der Lage, den Besuch auf dieser Internetseite mit anderen bei Google gespeicherten personenbezogenen Daten zu verknüpfen. Google zeichnet diese personenbezogenen Informationen ferner mit dem Zweck auf, die unterschiedlichen Dienste von Google zu verbessern oder zu optimieren.
Google erhält über die Google+-Schaltfläche immer dann eine Information darüber, dass die betroffene Person unsere Internetseite besucht hat, wenn die betroffene Person zum Zeitpunkt des Aufrufs unserer Internetseite gleichzeitig bei Google+ eingeloggt ist; dies findet unabhängig davon statt, ob die betroffene Person die Google+-Schaltfläche anklickt oder nicht.
Ist eine Übermittlung personenbezogener Daten an Google von der betroffenen Person nicht gewollt, kann diese eine solche Übermittlung dadurch verhindern, dass sie sich vor einem Aufruf unserer Internetseite aus ihrem Google+-Account ausloggt.
Weitere Informationen und die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von Google können unter https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/privacy/ abgerufen werden. Weitere Hinweise von Google zur Google+1-Schaltfläche können unter https://developers.google.com/+/web/buttons-policy abgerufen werden.
14. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Google-AdWords
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Google AdWords integriert. Google AdWords ist ein Dienst zur Internetwerbung, der es Werbetreibenden gestattet, sowohl Anzeigen in den Suchmaschinenergebnissen von Google als auch im Google-Werbenetzwerk zu schalten. Google AdWords ermöglicht es einem Werbetreibenden, vorab bestimmte Schlüsselwörter festzulegen, mittels derer eine Anzeige in den Suchmaschinenergebnissen von Google ausschließlich dann angezeigt wird, wenn der Nutzer mit der Suchmaschine ein schlüsselwortrelevantes Suchergebnis abruft. Im Google-Werbenetzwerk werden die Anzeigen mittels eines automatischen Algorithmus und unter Beachtung der zuvor festgelegten Schlüsselwörter auf themenrelevanten Internetseiten verteilt.
Betreibergesellschaft der Dienste von Google AdWords ist die Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
Der Zweck von Google AdWords ist die Bewerbung unserer Internetseite durch die Einblendung von interessenrelevanter Werbung auf den Internetseiten von Drittunternehmen und in den Suchmaschinenergebnissen der Suchmaschine Google und eine Einblendung von Fremdwerbung auf unserer Internetseite.
Gelangt eine betroffene Person über eine Google-Anzeige auf unsere Internetseite, wird auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person durch Google ein sogenannter Conversion-Cookie abgelegt. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Ein Conversion-Cookie verliert nach dreißig Tagen seine Gültigkeit und dient nicht zur Identifikation der betroffenen Person. Über den Conversion-Cookie wird, sofern das Cookie noch nicht abgelaufen ist, nachvollzogen, ob bestimmte Unterseiten, beispielsweise der Warenkorb von einem Online-Shop-System, auf unserer Internetseite aufgerufen wurden. Durch den Conversion-Cookie können sowohl wir als auch Google nachvollziehen, ob eine betroffene Person, die über eine AdWords-Anzeige auf unsere Internetseite gelangt ist, einen Umsatz generierte, also einen Warenkauf vollzogen oder abgebrochen hat.
Die durch die Nutzung des Conversion-Cookies erhobenen Daten und Informationen werden von Google verwendet, um Besuchsstatistiken für unsere Internetseite zu erstellen. Diese Besuchsstatistiken werden durch uns wiederum genutzt, um die Gesamtanzahl der Nutzer zu ermitteln, welche über AdWords-Anzeigen an uns vermittelt wurden, also um den Erfolg oder Misserfolg der jeweiligen AdWords-Anzeige zu ermitteln und um unsere AdWords-Anzeigen für die Zukunft zu optimieren. Weder unser Unternehmen noch andere Werbekunden von Google-AdWords erhalten Informationen von Google, mittels derer die betroffene Person identifiziert werden könnte.
Mittels des Conversion-Cookies werden personenbezogene Informationen, beispielsweise die durch die betroffene Person besuchten Internetseiten, gespeichert. Bei jedem Besuch unserer Internetseiten werden demnach personenbezogene Daten, einschließlich der IP-Adresse des von der betroffenen Person genutzten Internetanschlusses, an Google in den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika übertragen. Diese personenbezogenen Daten werden durch Google in den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika gespeichert. Google gibt diese über das technische Verfahren erhobenen personenbezogenen Daten unter Umständen an Dritte weiter.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass Google einen Conversion-Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem kann ein von Google AdWords bereits gesetzter Cookie jederzeit über den Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Ferner besteht für die betroffene Person die Möglichkeit, der interessenbezogenen Werbung durch Google zu widersprechen. Hierzu muss die betroffene Person von jedem der von ihr genutzten Internetbrowser aus den Link www.google.de/settings/ads aufrufen und dort die gewünschten Einstellungen vornehmen.
Weitere Informationen und die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von Google können unter https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/privacy/ abgerufen werden.
15. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Twitter
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten von Twitter integriert. Twitter ist ein multilingualer öffentlich zugänglicher Mikroblogging-Dienst, auf welchem die Nutzer sogenannte Tweets, also Kurznachrichten, die auf 280 Zeichen begrenzt sind, veröffentlichen und verbreiten können. Diese Kurznachrichten sind für jedermann, also auch für nicht bei Twitter angemeldete Personen abrufbar. Die Tweets werden aber auch den sogenannten Followern des jeweiligen Nutzers angezeigt. Follower sind andere Twitter-Nutzer, die den Tweets eines Nutzers folgen. Ferner ermöglicht Twitter über Hashtags, Verlinkungen oder Retweets die Ansprache eines breiten Publikums.
Betreibergesellschaft von Twitter International Company, One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street Dublin 2, D02 AX07, Ireland.
Durch jeden Aufruf einer der Einzelseiten dieser Internetseite, die durch den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen betrieben wird und auf welcher eine Twitter-Komponente (Twitter-Button) integriert wurde, wird der Internetbrowser auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person automatisch durch die jeweilige Twitter-Komponente veranlasst, eine Darstellung der entsprechenden Twitter-Komponente von Twitter herunterzuladen. Weitere Informationen zu den Twitter-Buttons sind unter https://about.twitter.com/de/resources/buttons abrufbar. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhält Twitter Kenntnis darüber, welche konkrete Unterseite unserer Internetseite durch die betroffene Person besucht wird. Zweck der Integration der Twitter-Komponente ist es, unseren Nutzern eine Weiterverbreitung der Inhalte diese Internetseite zu ermöglichen, diese Internetseite in der digitalen Welt bekannt zu machen und unsere Besucherzahlen zu erhöhen.
Sofern die betroffene Person gleichzeitig bei Twitter eingeloggt ist, erkennt Twitter mit jedem Aufruf unserer Internetseite durch die betroffene Person und während der gesamten Dauer des jeweiligen Aufenthaltes auf unserer Internetseite, welche konkrete Unterseite unserer Internetseite die betroffene Person besucht. Diese Informationen werden durch die Twitter-Komponente gesammelt und durch Twitter dem jeweiligen Twitter-Account der betroffenen Person zugeordnet. Betätigt die betroffene Person einen der auf unserer Internetseite integrierten Twitter-Buttons, werden die damit übertragenen Daten und Informationen dem persönlichen Twitter-Benutzerkonto der betroffenen Person zugeordnet und von Twitter gespeichert und verarbeitet.
Twitter erhält über die Twitter-Komponente immer dann eine Information darüber, dass die betroffene Person unsere Internetseite besucht hat, wenn die betroffene Person zum Zeitpunkt des Aufrufs unserer Internetseite gleichzeitig bei Twitter eingeloggt ist; dies findet unabhängig davon statt, ob die betroffene Person die Twitter-Komponente anklickt oder nicht. Ist eine derartige Übermittlung dieser Informationen an Twitter von der betroffenen Person nicht gewollt, kann diese die Übermittlung dadurch verhindern, dass sie sich vor einem Aufruf unserer Internetseite aus ihrem Twitter-Account ausloggt.
Die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von Twitter sind unter https://twitter.com/privacy?lang=de abrufbar.
16. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von DoubleClick
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten von DoubleClick by Google integriert. DoubleClick ist eine Marke von Google, unter welcher vorwiegend spezielle Online-Marketing-Lösungen an Werbeagenturen und Verlage vermarktet werden.
Betreibergesellschaft von Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
DoubleClick by Google überträgt sowohl mit jeder Impression als auch mit Klicks oder anderen Aktivitäten Daten auf den DoubleClick-Server. Jede dieser Datenübertragungen löst eine Cookie-Anfrage an den Browser der betroffenen Person aus. Akzeptiert der Browser diese Anfrage, setzt DoubleClick ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Zweck des Cookies ist die Optimierung und Einblendung von Werbung. Das Cookie wird unter anderem dazu verwendet, nutzerrelevante Werbung zu schalten und anzuzeigen sowie um Berichte zu Werbekampagnen zu erstellen oder diese zu verbessern. Ferner dient das Cookie dazu, Mehrfacheinblendungen derselben Werbung zu vermeiden.
DoubleClick verwendet eine Cookie-ID, die zur Abwicklung des technischen Verfahrens erforderlich ist. Die Cookie-ID wird beispielsweise benötigt, um eine Werbeanzeige in einem Browser anzuzeigen. DoubleClick kann über die Cookie-ID zudem erfassen, welche Werbeanzeigen bereits in einem Browser eingeblendet wurden, um Doppelschaltungen zu vermeiden. Ferner ist es DoubleClick durch die Cookie-ID möglich, Conversions zu erfassen. Conversions werden beispielsweise dann erfasst, wenn einem Nutzer zuvor eine DoubleClick-Werbeanzeige eingeblendet wurde und dieser in der Folge mit dem gleichen Internetbrowser einen Kauf auf der Internetseite des Werbetreibenden vollzieht.
Ein Cookie von DoubleClick enthält keine personenbezogenen Daten. Ein DoubleClick-Cookie kann aber zusätzliche Kampagnen-Kennungen enthalten. Eine Kampagnen-Kennung dient einer Identifizierung der Kampagnen, mit denen der Nutzer bereits in Kontakt war.
Durch jeden Aufruf einer der Einzelseiten dieser Internetseite, die durch den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen betrieben wird und auf welcher eine DoubleClick-Komponente integriert wurde, wird der Internetbrowser auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person automatisch durch die jeweilige DoubleClick-Komponente veranlasst, Daten zum Zwecke der Online-Werbung und der Abrechnung von Provisionen an Google zu übermitteln. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhält Google Kenntnis über Daten, die Google auch dazu dienen, Provisionsabrechnungen zu erstellen. Google kann unter anderem nachvollziehen, dass die betroffene Person bestimmte Links auf unserer Internetseite angeklickt hat.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass Google ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem können von Google bereits gesetzte Cookies jederzeit über einen Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Weitere Informationen und die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von DoubleClick by Google können unter https://www.google.com/intl/de/policies/ abgerufen werden.
17. Rechtsgrundlage der Verarbeitung
Art. 6 I lit. a DS-GVO dient unserem Unternehmen als Rechtsgrundlage für Verarbeitungsvorgänge, bei denen wir eine Einwilligung für einen bestimmten Verarbeitungszweck einholen. Ist die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten zur Erfüllung eines Vertrags, dessen Vertragspartei die betroffene Person ist, erforderlich, wie dies beispielsweise bei Verarbeitungsvorgängen der Fall ist, die für eine Lieferung von Waren oder die Erbringung einer sonstigen Leistung oder Gegenleistung notwendig sind, so beruht die Verarbeitung auf Art. 6 I lit. b DS-GVO. Gleiches gilt für solche Verarbeitungsvorgänge die zur Durchführung vorvertraglicher Maßnahmen erforderlich sind, etwa in Fällen von Anfragen zur unseren Produkten oder Leistungen. Unterliegt unser Unternehmen einer rechtlichen Verpflichtung durch welche eine Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten erforderlich wird, wie beispielsweise zur Erfüllung steuerlicher Pflichten, so basiert die Verarbeitung auf Art. 6 I lit. c DS-GVO. In seltenen Fällen könnte die Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten erforderlich werden, um lebenswichtige Interessen der betroffenen Person oder einer anderen natürlichen Person zu schützen. Dies wäre beispielsweise der Fall, wenn ein Besucher in unserem Betrieb verletzt werden würde und daraufhin sein Name, sein Alter, seine Krankenkassendaten oder sonstige lebenswichtige Informationen an einen Arzt, ein Krankenhaus oder sonstige Dritte weitergegeben werden müssten. Dann würde die Verarbeitung auf Art. 6 I lit. d DS-GVO beruhen.
Letztlich könnten Verarbeitungsvorgänge auf Art. 6 I lit. f DS-GVO beruhen. Auf dieser Rechtsgrundlage basieren Verarbeitungsvorgänge, die von keiner der vorgenannten Rechtsgrundlagen erfasst werden, wenn die Verarbeitung zur Wahrung eines berechtigten Interesses unseres Unternehmens oder eines Dritten erforderlich ist, sofern die Interessen, Grundrechte und Grundfreiheiten des Betroffenen nicht überwiegen. Solche Verarbeitungsvorgänge sind uns insbesondere deshalb gestattet, weil sie durch den Europäischen Gesetzgeber besonders erwähnt wurden. Er vertrat insoweit die Auffassung, dass ein berechtigtes Interesse anzunehmen sein könnte, wenn die betroffene Person ein Kunde des Verantwortlichen ist (Erwägungsgrund 47 Satz 2 DS-GVO).
18. Berechtigte Interessen an der Verarbeitung, die von dem Verantwortlichen oder einem Dritten verfolgt werden
Basiert die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten auf Artikel 6 I lit. f DS-GVO ist unser berechtigtes Interesse die Durchführung unserer Geschäftstätigkeit zugunsten des Wohlergehens all unserer Mitarbeiter und unserer Anteilseigner.
19. Dauer, für die die personenbezogenen Daten gespeichert werden
Das Kriterium für die Dauer der Speicherung von personenbezogenen Daten ist die jeweilige gesetzliche Aufbewahrungsfrist. Nach Ablauf der Frist werden die entsprechenden Daten routinemäßig gelöscht, sofern sie nicht mehr zur Vertragserfüllung oder Vertragsanbahnung erforderlich sind.
20. Gesetzliche oder vertragliche Vorschriften zur Bereitstellung der personenbezogenen Daten; Erforderlichkeit für den Vertragsabschluss; Verpflichtung der betroffenen Person, die personenbezogenen Daten bereitzustellen; mögliche Folgen der Nichtbereitstellung
Wir klären Sie darüber auf, dass die Bereitstellung personenbezogener Daten zum Teil gesetzlich vorgeschrieben ist (z.B. Steuervorschriften) oder sich auch aus vertraglichen Regelungen (z.B. Angaben zum Vertragspartner) ergeben kann.
Mitunter kann es zu einem Vertragsschluss erforderlich sein, dass eine betroffene Person uns personenbezogene Daten zur Verfügung stellt, die in der Folge durch uns verarbeitet werden müssen. Die betroffene Person ist beispielsweise verpflichtet uns personenbezogene Daten bereitzustellen, wenn unser Unternehmen mit ihr einen Vertrag abschließt. Eine Nichtbereitstellung der personenbezogenen Daten hätte zur Folge, dass der Vertrag mit dem Betroffenen nicht geschlossen werden könnte.
Vor einer Bereitstellung personenbezogener Daten durch den Betroffenen muss sich der Betroffene an einen unserer Mitarbeiter wenden. Unser Mitarbeiter klärt den Betroffenen einzelfallbezogen darüber auf, ob die Bereitstellung der personenbezogenen Daten gesetzlich oder vertraglich vorgeschrieben oder für den Vertragsabschluss erforderlich ist, ob eine Verpflichtung besteht, die personenbezogenen Daten bereitzustellen, und welche Folgen die Nichtbereitstellung der personenbezogenen Daten hätte.
21. Bestehen einer automatisierten Entscheidungsfindung
Als verantwortungsbewusstes Unternehmen verzichten wir auf eine automatische Entscheidungsfindung oder ein Profiling.
Diese Datenschutzerklärung wurde durch den Datenschutzerklärungs-Generator der DGD Deutsche Gesellschaft für Datenschutz GmbH, die als
Externer Datenschutzbeauftragter Kempten
tätig ist, in Kooperation mit dem
Anwalt für IT- und Datenschutzrecht
Christian Solmecke erstellt.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://privacypolicytemplate.net/:
Generate Privacy Policy
Where will your Privacy Policy be used?
Click all that apply
Website
Privacy Policy for Website
App
Privacy Policy for App
Continue & Generate Privacy Policy
You will be redirected to our trusted partner website
to generate the Free Privacy Policy.
Privacy Policy Template Generator
Practically every single website worth anything out there has a Privacy Policy page that it can turn to whenever issues about privacy come up with users. That's why you really need to have a privacy policy, but it's not exactly that easy to make one, not if you really want to cover all of your bases. This is why you may want to look into the matter of
privacy policy template generator
(like ours here!) since it comes with quite a few benefits.
A privacy policy
is a legal document that details how a website gathers, stores, shares, and sells data about its visitors. This data typically includes items such as a user's name, address, birthday, marital status, medical history, and consumer behavior.
The specific contents of a privacy policy document depend upon the laws in the legal jurisdiction in which your business operates. Most countries have their own set of guidelines regarding what information is eligible for collection, and how that information may be used. Privacy laws include GDPR, CCPA, CalOPPA, PIPEDA, Australia Privacy Act and many more.
When it comes to legal documents, it is best not to take chances. Fortunately,
it's easy to get a free privacy policy in just a few minutes.
All you have to do is fill up the blank spaces on the right and we will create help you create
your own personalized privacy policy template for your business.
The accuracy of the generated document on this website is not legally binding. Use at your own risk.
Looking for a Terms and Conditions Template?
Check out
Terms and Conditions Generator
.
Questions & Answers about Privacy Policies
Is A Privacy Policy Necessary?
In a word, absolutely. A privacy policy isn't just about telling your users what they can expected from your website, products, and services. It's about protecting you against potential liabilities that could arise from those aspects. It doesn't even have to be the users that go after you but also government agencies since they can be real sticklers for details.
More than the actual consequences of not having a privacy policy, it also helps to legitimize your website's authority if you have one. It just comes parts and parcel with having a successful online business.
What's A Privacy Policy Template?
For the most part, a privacy policy template is just what it sounds like. It's a template that was already made by somebody else and that you can use for your own website if you wanted to. This is incredibly helpful because creating a privacy policy from scratch can be a troublesome affair if you have no legal training. You would have to commission the help of a lawyer in order to do it right.
If your website is aiming for legitimacy, you definitely don't want to take this issue lightly. You can easily get in trouble with your customers and with the law if you don't have a privacy policy or if you have a bad one.
How Can I Use A Privacy Policy?
Usually, privacy policy templates are pretty straightforward. You can get one from a reputable source, copy the template and then paste it on your privacy page. Many of the relevant details will either be left blank or will need to be replaced. Either way, you need to be careful about the information that you put in the page.
You want to focus on company name or website name, the name of the site owner, company CEO, or web manager, and a few important details about purchases, service charges, and so on. Other than a few tweaks, a good template won't require much from you.
Preview Your Privacy Policy
Privacy Policy of
Company Name
Company Name
operates the
Website Name
website, which provides the SERVICE.
This page is used to inform website visitors regarding our policies with the collection, use, and disclosure of Personal Information if anyone decided to use our Service, the
Website Name
website.
If you choose to use our Service, then you agree to the collection and use of information in relation with this policy. The Personal Information that we collect are used for providing and improving the Service. We will not use or share your information with anyone except as described in this Privacy Policy.
The terms used in this Privacy Policy have the same meanings as in our Terms and Conditions, which is accessible at
Website URL
, unless otherwise defined in this Privacy Policy.
Information Collection and Use
For a better experience while using our Service, we may require you to provide us with certain personally identifiable information, including but not limited to your name, phone number, and postal address. The information that we collect will be used to contact or identify you.
Log Data
We want to inform you that whenever you visit our Service, we collect information that your browser sends to us that is called Log Data. This Log Data may include information such as your computer's Internet Protocol (“IP”) address, browser version, pages of our Service that you visit, the time and date of your visit, the time spent on those pages, and other statistics.
Cookies
Cookies are files with small amount of data that is commonly used an anonymous unique identifier. These are sent to your browser from the website that you visit and are stored on your computer's hard drive.
Our website uses these “cookies” to collection information and to improve our Service. You have the option to either accept or refuse these cookies, and know when a cookie is being sent to your computer. If you choose to refuse our cookies, you may not be able to use some portions of our Service.
Service Providers
We may employ third-party companies and individuals due to the following reasons:
To facilitate our Service;
To provide the Service on our behalf;
To perform Service-related services; or
To assist us in analyzing how our Service is used.
We want to inform our Service users that these third parties have access to your Personal Information. The reason is to perform the tasks assigned to them on our behalf. However, they are obligated not to disclose or use the information for any other purpose.
Security
We value your trust in providing us your Personal Information, thus we are striving to use commercially acceptable means of protecting it. But remember that no method of transmission over the internet, or method of electronic storage is 100% secure and reliable, and we cannot guarantee its absolute security.
Links to Other Sites
Our Service may contain links to other sites. If you click on a third-party link, you will be directed to that site. Note that these external sites are not operated by us. Therefore, we strongly advise you to review the Privacy Policy of these websites. We have no control over, and assume no responsibility for the content, privacy policies, or practices of any third-party sites or services.
Children's Privacy
Our Services do not address anyone under the age of 13. We do not knowingly collect personal identifiable information from children under 13. In the case we discover that a child under 13 has provided us with personal information, we immediately delete this from our servers. If you are a parent or guardian and you are aware that your child has provided us with personal information, please contact us so that we will be able to do necessary actions.
Changes to This Privacy Policy
We may update our Privacy Policy from time to time. Thus, we advise you to review this page periodically for any changes. We will notify you of any changes by posting the new Privacy Policy on this page. These changes are effective immediately, after they are posted on this page.
Contact Us
If you have any questions or suggestions about our Privacy Policy, do not hesitate to contact us.
Sub-policy 1
https://app-privacy-policy-generator.firebaseapp.com/:
App Privacy Policy Generator
Generate a customized Privacy Policy and Terms of Use document for your mobile apps
Forever
free and open-source,
built with
♥️
by
Nishant
and
contributors.
⭐️ Check out the Guestbook for reviews
|
Read FAQ
Start
Privacy Policy
This privacy policy applies to the  app (hereby referred to as "Application") for mobile devices that was created by [Developer/Company name] (hereby referred to as "Service Provider") as [open source/free/freemium/ad-supported/commercial] service. This service is intended for use "AS IS".
Information Collection and Use
The Application collects information when you download and use it. This information may include information such as
Your device's Internet Protocol address (e.g. IP address)
The pages of the Application that you visit, the time and date of your visit, the time spent on those pages
The time spent on the Application
The operating system you use on your mobile device
The Application does not gather precise information about the location of your mobile device.
The Application collects your device's location, which helps the Service Provider determine your approximate geographical location and make use of in below ways:
Geolocation Services: The Service Provider utilizes location data to provide features such as personalized content, relevant recommendations, and location-based services.
Analytics and Improvements: Aggregated and anonymized location data helps the Service Provider to analyze user behavior, identify trends, and improve the overall performance and functionality of the Application.
Third-Party Services: Periodically, the Service Provider may transmit anonymized location data to external services. These services assist them in enhancing the Application and optimizing their offerings.
The Service Provider may use the information you provided to contact you from time to time to provide you with important information, required notices and marketing promotions.
For a better experience, while using the Application, the Service Provider may require you to provide us with certain personally identifiable information[add whatever else you collect here, e.g. users name, address, location, pictures] The information that the Service Provider request will be retained by them and used as described in this privacy policy.
Third Party Access
Only aggregated, anonymized data is periodically transmitted to external services to aid the Service Provider in improving the Application and their service. The Service Provider may share your information with third parties in the ways that are described in this privacy statement.
Please note that the Application utilizes third-party services that have their own Privacy Policy about handling data. Below are the links to the Privacy Policy of the third-party service providers used by the Application:
Google Play Services
The Service Provider may disclose User Provided and Automatically Collected Information:
as required by law, such as to comply with a subpoena, or similar legal process;
when they believe in good faith that disclosure is necessary to protect their rights, protect your safety or the safety of others, investigate fraud, or respond to a government request;
with their trusted services providers who work on their behalf, do not have an independent use of the information we disclose to them, and have agreed to adhere to the rules set forth in this privacy statement.
Opt-Out Rights
You can stop all collection of information by the Application easily by uninstalling it. You may use the standard uninstall processes as may be available as part of your mobile device or via the mobile application marketplace or network.
Data Retention Policy
The Service Provider will retain User Provided data for as long as you use the Application and for a reasonable time thereafter. If you'd like them to delete User Provided Data that you have provided via the Application, please contact them at  and they will respond in a reasonable time.
Children
The Service Provider does not use the Application to knowingly solicit data from or market to children under the age of 13.
The Application does not address anyone under the age of 13.
The Service Provider does not knowingly collect personally
identifiable information from children under 13 years of age. In the case
the Service Provider discover that a child under 13 has provided
personal information, the Service Provider will immediately
delete this from their servers. If you are a parent or guardian
and you are aware that your child has provided us with
personal information, please contact the Service Provider () so that
they will be able to take the necessary actions.
Security
The Service Provider is concerned about safeguarding the confidentiality of your information. The Service Provider provides physical, electronic, and procedural safeguards to protect information the Service Provider processes and maintains.
Changes
This Privacy Policy may be updated from time to time for any reason. The Service Provider will notify you of any changes to the Privacy Policy by updating this page with the new Privacy Policy. You are advised to consult this Privacy Policy regularly for any changes, as continued use is deemed approval of all changes.
This privacy policy is effective as of 2025-03-15
Your Consent
By using the Application, you are consenting to the processing of your information as set forth in this Privacy Policy now and as amended by us.
Contact Us
If you have any questions regarding privacy while using the Application, or have questions about the practices, please contact the Service Provider via email at .
This privacy policy page was generated by
App Privacy Policy Generator
Privacy Policy
This privacy policy applies to the  app (hereby referred to as "Application") for mobile devices that was created by [Developer/Company name] (hereby referred to as "Service Provider") as [open source/free/freemium/ad-supported/commercial] service. This service is intended for use "AS IS".
What information does the Application obtain and how is it used?
The Application does not obtain any information when you download and use it. Registration is not required to use the Application.
Does the Application collect precise real time location information of the device?
This Application does not collect precise information about the location of your mobile device.
Do third parties see and/or have access to information obtained by the Application?
Since the Application does not collect any information, no data is shared with third parties.
What are my opt-out rights?
You can stop all collection of information by the Application easily by uninstalling it. You may use the standard uninstall processes as may be available as part of your mobile device or via the mobile application marketplace or network.
Children
The Application is not used to knowingly solicit data from or market to children under the age of 13.
The Service Provider does not knowingly collect personally
identifiable information from children. The Service Provider 
encourages all children to never submit any personally
identifiable information through the Application and/or Services.
The Service Provider encourage parents and legal guardians to monitor 
their children's Internet usage and to help enforce this Policy by instructing 
their children never to provide personally identifiable information through the Application and/or Services without their permission. If you have reason to believe that a child 
has provided personally identifiable information to the Service Provider through the Application and/or Services, 
please contact the Service Provider () so that they will be able to take the necessary actions. 
You must also be at least 16 years of age to consent to the processing 
of your personally identifiable information in your country (in some countries we may allow your parent 
or guardian to do so on your behalf).
Security
The Service Provider is concerned about safeguarding the confidentiality of your information. However, since the Application does not collect any information, there is no risk of your data being accessed by unauthorized individuals.
Changes
This Privacy Policy may be updated from time to time for any reason. The Service Provider will notify you of any changes to their Privacy Policy by updating this page with the new Privacy Policy. You are advised to consult this Privacy Policy regularly for any changes, as continued use is deemed approval of all changes.
This privacy policy is effective as of 2025-03-15
Your Consent
By using the Application, you are consenting to the processing of your information as set forth in this Privacy Policy now and as amended by the Service Provider.
Contact Us
If you have any questions regarding privacy while using the Application, or have questions about the practices, please contact the Service Provider via email at .
This privacy policy page was generated by
App Privacy Policy Generator
Privacy Policy
This privacy policy is applicable to the  app (hereinafter referred to as "Application") for mobile devices, which was developed by [Developer/Company name] (hereinafter referred to as "Service Provider") as a [open source/free/freemium/ad-supported/commercial] service. This service is provided "AS IS".
What information does the Application obtain and how is it used?
User Provided Information
The Application acquires the information you supply when you download and register the Application. Registration with the Service Provider is not mandatory. However, bear in mind that you might not be able to utilize some of the features offered by the Application unless you register with them.
The Service Provider may also use the information you provided them to contact you from time to time to provide you with important information, required notices and marketing promotions.
Automatically Collected Information
In addition, the Application may collect certain information automatically, including, but not limited to, the type of mobile device you use, your mobile devices unique device ID, the IP address of your mobile device, your mobile operating system, the type of mobile Internet browsers you use, and information about the way you use the Application.
Does the Application collect precise real time location information of the device?
This Application does not gather precise information about the location of your mobile device.
This Application collects your device's location, which helps the Service Provider determine your approximate geographical location and make use of in below ways:
Geolocation Services: The Service Provider utilizes location data to provide features such as personalized content, relevant recommendations, and location-based services.
Analytics and Improvements: Aggregated and anonymized location data helps the Service Provider to analyze user behavior, identify trends, and improve the overall performance and functionality of the Application.
Third-Party Services: Periodically, the Service Provider may transmit anonymized location data to external services. These services assist them in enhancing the Application and optimizing their offerings.
Do third parties see and/or have access to information obtained by the Application?
Only aggregated, anonymized data is periodically transmitted to external services to aid the Service Provider in improving the Application and their service. The Service Provider may share your information with third parties in the ways that are described in this privacy statement.
Please note that the Application utilizes third-party services that have their own Privacy Policy about handling data. Below are the links to the Privacy Policy of the third-party service providers used by the Application:
Google Play Services
The Service Provider may disclose User Provided and Automatically Collected Information:
as required by law, such as to comply with a subpoena, or similar legal process;
when they believe in good faith that disclosure is necessary to protect their rights, protect your safety or the safety of others, investigate fraud, or respond to a government request;
with their trusted services providers who work on their behalf, do not have an independent use of the information we disclose to them, and have agreed to adhere to the rules set forth in this privacy statement.
What are my opt-out rights?
You can halt all collection of information by the Application easily by uninstalling the Application. You may use the standard uninstall processes as may be available as part of your mobile device or via the mobile application marketplace or network.
Data Retention Policy, Managing Your Information
The Service Provider will retain User Provided data for as long as you use the Application and for a reasonable time thereafter. The Service Provider will retain Automatically Collected information for up to 24 months and thereafter may store it in aggregate. If you'd like the Service Provider to delete User Provided Data that you have provided via the Application, please contact them at  and we will respond in a reasonable time. Please note that some or all of the User Provided Data may be required in order for the Application to function properly.
Children
The Service Provider does not use the Application to knowingly solicit data from or market to children under the age of 13.
The Application does not address anyone under the age of 13.
The Service Provider does not knowingly collect personally
identifiable information from children under 13 years of age. In the case
the Service Provider discover that a child under 13 has provided
personal information, the Service Provider will immediately
delete this from their servers. If you are a parent or guardian
and you are aware that your child has provided us with
personal information, please contact the Service Provider () so that
they will be able to take the necessary actions.
Security
The Service Provider are concerned about safeguarding the confidentiality of your information. The Service Provider provide physical, electronic, and procedural safeguards to protect information we process and maintain. For example, we limit access to this information to authorized employees and contractors who need to know that information in order to operate, develop or improve their Application. Please be aware that, although we endeavor provide reasonable security for information we process and maintain, no security system can prevent all potential security breaches.
Changes
This Privacy Policy may be updated from time to time for any reason. The Service Provider will notify you of any changes to the Privacy Policy by updating this page with the new Privacy Policy. You are advised to consult this Privacy Policy regularly for any changes, as continued use is deemed approval of all changes.
This privacy policy is effective as of 2025-03-15
Your Consent
By using the Application, you are giving your consent to the Service Provider processing of your information as set forth in this Privacy Policy now and as amended by us. "Processing,” means using cookies on a computer/hand held device or using or touching information in any way, including, but not limited to, collecting, storing, deleting, using, combining and disclosing information.
Contact us
If you have any questions regarding privacy while using the Application, or have questions about the practices, please contact the Service Provider via email at .
This privacy policy page was generated by
App Privacy Policy Generator
Terms & Conditions
These terms and conditions apply to the  app (hereby referred to as "Application") for mobile devices that was created by [Developer/Company name] (hereby referred to as "Service Provider") as [open source/free/freemium/ad-supported/commercial] service.
Upon downloading or utilizing the Application, you are automatically agreeing to the following terms. It is strongly advised that you thoroughly read and understand these terms prior to using the Application. Unauthorized copying, modification of the Application, any part of the Application, or our trademarks is strictly prohibited. Any attempts to extract the source code of the Application, translate the Application into other languages, or create derivative versions are not permitted. All trademarks, copyrights, database rights, and other intellectual property rights related to the Application remain the property of the Service Provider.
The Service Provider is dedicated to ensuring that the Application is as beneficial and efficient as possible. As such, they reserve the right to modify the Application or charge for their services at any time and for any reason. The Service Provider assures you that any charges for the Application or its services will be clearly communicated to you.
The Application stores and processes personal data that you have provided to the Service Provider in order to provide the Service. It is your responsibility to maintain the security of your phone and access to the Application. The Service Provider strongly advise against jailbreaking or rooting your phone, which involves removing software restrictions and limitations imposed by the official operating system of your device. Such actions could expose your phone to malware, viruses, malicious programs, compromise your phone's security features, and may result in the Application not functioning correctly or at all.
Please note that the Application utilizes third-party services that have their own Terms and Conditions. Below are the links to the Terms and Conditions of the third-party service providers used by the Application:
Google Play Services
Please be aware that the Service Provider does not assume responsibility for certain aspects. Some functions of the Application require an active internet connection, which can be Wi-Fi or provided by your mobile network provider. The Service Provider cannot be held responsible if the Application does not function at full capacity due to lack of access to Wi-Fi or if you have exhausted your data allowance.
If you are using the application outside of a Wi-Fi area, please be aware that your mobile network provider's agreement terms still apply. Consequently, you may incur charges from your mobile provider for data usage during the connection to the application, or other third-party charges. By using the application, you accept responsibility for any such charges, including roaming data charges if you use the application outside of your home territory (i.e., region or country) without disabling data roaming. If you are not the bill payer for the device on which you are using the application, they assume that you have obtained permission from the bill payer.
Similarly, the Service Provider cannot always assume responsibility for your usage of the application. For instance, it is your responsibility to ensure that your device remains charged. If your device runs out of battery and you are unable to access the Service, the Service Provider cannot be held responsible.
In terms of the Service Provider's responsibility for your use of the application, it is important to note that while they strive to ensure that it is updated and accurate at all times, they do rely on third parties to provide information to them so that they can make it available to you. The Service Provider accepts no liability for any loss, direct or indirect, that you experience as a result of relying entirely on this functionality of the application.
The Service Provider may wish to update the application at some point. The application is currently available as per the requirements for the operating system (and for any additional systems they decide to extend the availability of the application to) may change, and you will need to download the updates if you want to continue using the application. The Service Provider does not guarantee that it will always update the application so that it is relevant to you and/or compatible with the particular operating system version installed on your device. However, you agree to always accept updates to the application when offered to you. The Service Provider may also wish to cease providing the application and may terminate its use at any time without providing termination notice to you. Unless they inform you otherwise, upon any termination, (a) the rights and licenses granted to you in these terms will end; (b) you must cease using the application, and (if necessary) delete it from your device.
Changes to These Terms and Conditions
The Service Provider may periodically update their Terms and Conditions. Therefore, you are advised to review this page regularly for any changes. The Service Provider will notify you of any changes by posting the new Terms and Conditions on this page.
These terms and conditions are effective as of 2025-03-15
Contact Us
If you have any questions or suggestions about the Terms and Conditions, please do not hesitate to contact the Service Provider at .
This Terms and Conditions page was generated by
App Privacy Policy Generator
This template for Privacy Policy and Terms & Conditions is furnished on an "AS IS" basis, devoid of any express or implied warranties or conditions.
It serves as a reference document for you while drafting your own privacy policy.
The developer of the App Privacy Policy Generator disclaims any liability for the legal implications arising from the utilization of this privacy policy or terms & conditions.
It is strongly recommended to obtain independent legal counsel to ensure compliance with all regulations applicable to the users of your application.
The developer of the App Privacy Policy Generator cannot be held accountable for any direct or indirect damage/loss incurred by an individual/company as a result of using this document.
What is a privacy policy?
A privacy policy is a legal document that informs individuals about how an organization/individual collects, uses, discloses, and manages their personal data. It outlines the ways in which personal information is handled, including details about data collection, storage, and sharing practices. Essentially, it provides transparency to users regarding their privacy rights and how their data is treated.
What is personal data?
Personal data refers to any information related to an identified or identifiable living individual. It encompasses various identifiers, such as names, email addresses, phone numbers, home addresses, IP addresses, and more. Essentially, any data that can be used to identify a specific person falls under the category of personal data.
Why is a privacy policy important?
A privacy policy is a critical component of any Service Provider's online presence, as it outlines the handling and protection of sensitive customer information. It establishes trust between the service provider and its customers, demonstrating a commitment to protecting their personal data. A well-crafted privacy policy can help prevent legal liabilities and reputational damages, while also providing transparency and clarity on how customer information is collected, used, and shared. By having a comprehensive privacy policy in place, organizations can maintain a competitive advantage, build customer loyalty, and foster a positive brand image.
Is it safe to use a privacy policy template?
Yes, using a privacy policy template is generally safe and efficient. Templates are designed to align with data protection laws, ensuring compliance. However, it's essential to customize the template to accurately reflect your specific practices and business context. Always review and tailor the template to suit your needs.
What are terms and condition?
Terms and conditions are a critical component of contractual agreements, ensuring that all parties have a clear understanding of their rights and responsibilities. These terms are incorporated into a legally binding agreement, adhering to relevant local, state, and federal laws. They establish essential boundaries that all parties must adhere to, providing clarity on acceptable and prohibited platform usage, managing user expectations, and outlining procedures for account termination and suspension. Additionally, these terms specify the governing laws applicable to the contract, provide mechanisms for dispute resolution, and address necessary disclaimers or warranties as required by law. By incorporating these terms into a legal agreement, businesses and customers can ensure they are fully informed of their rights and obligations, promoting a mutually beneficial relationship.
Why is this Privacy Policy Generator free?
This project was built out of a need for a free and open source Privacy Policy Generator for my Android applications.
Most such products online are pay walled or find ways to extract money from indie devs 
like me. I built this for myself first, but eventually saw how it was useful for a lot of
people. Today this webapp is used by people from all over the world, and I hope it will continue to be so.